      "identifier" : [
         "8_06770_101"
      ],
      "text" : [
         "1;. e e W pP W c UM. ;-Nk Mw Xle Wc. îý 'Q ý1 mÈý. e 5'i. rîý--V u e on e, ILI 2Z 4i. vo t V el 1ýe C L 21 àý c -5 ýi àký \"\"lez \u003e el âc",
         "1'7ý 1 L.P. ie. îr lei Y. 4e 'A ý«WÏMl Mr à 'UNI ze P IJ C 7, e: r Txe,ý e A4. YJ ý4. ý1\u0026 î , . X ýÈ ;44 r. r 5v .y uw, Jýà CýW lv 11il. Uý M 10 e« WC YW\u003e le \u003e le î fj- -ë; X4 re .7ý $K",
         "Et\u003ee UKestern ttjool '3ournial Vol. XI. No.1 Contents for January, 1916 EDITORIAIL- Page A Forward Move ......... ......... Ruralizing the Rural Schools ...... The Provincial Associations ... 2 Children of the Year ................. DEPPARTMENT OF EDUCATION- Patriotic Fund ........................ Farm Manual Training .............. Hot Lunch Idea is Spreading . Suggested Outlines in Drawing. Winter Sports ................... S N otice ................................. 7 Simplified Spelling ..................... 7 SPECIAL ARTICLES-",
         "THE WESTERN SCH00OL .JOU-RNÂi, A MAILING LIST of SATISFIED PEOPLE Such is the List of EATON Mail -Order Customers lt js a ltt or pelei thteugiotît \\X'utvr ( Caliad il \u003c\u003e (ailv~ elljoy opportîtaities an bt1letlefits i11 liviflg tha t onfly thle EATOii Service Cali place ltefore thern. 'lit EATN wy oif (l(titg business is resI)olsibi( for t li oip- poi)(liIities and1( ben (fits titese saitisfied eustoîners 0)tiit. Our- huyers in the great business centres of the -worl. anitiei- p)atiflg large sales, l)ureitase goods in tremendous (luantities at the loivest, cost prices. Thlese goods are bought froin reliaitie and wel ~ ~ ~ ~ ~ ~ ~ 1 lkîwmfrsti seerg teeandse of the fiutest qna lit v anîd dnlrahilit. We seli direct to the publie for cashi, etittîng out the pr-ofits of who]esa bers and ittidi Ilemlen.l Ioingr busîtmss nittsu b SIVst etti ail jiossility of ba d del)ts is elîniîîated. Promptness and Efficiency in EATON Service TIie instant execut ion of every 01(1er receive(l, thle pîîoîîîptest ptossible delivery of ail goodls. eomnibimied witbi ail efficielie t ditt de] vers lhien ]i perfect cond(itionl are' imptlort an itliffile5 it tIti EATON inail-or-der service. Oui- systei runs Illzke nerfectlv regula ted îîa ut ',and Oti are filly assured tbat once von send uis your 01(1er, whethlet big~ or. sittai 1 it wil i be exeeuted in the lest possible ia itiet tua t modern w'%avs and( ineaus ean devise. If you have flot already a copy of the latest EATON Catalogue write for one. Sent free on request. If you have a catalogue ii wfll pay you to give it another reading, for market conditions just now axe such as to emphasize the splendid value of EATON mai-order offerings. 4-iýT. EATON COLMTED WINNIPEG -CANADA Klndty mention, the Western Schoot Journal when writing to Advertlaers.",
         "r-bc W t5tr ctbool 3ournal (AUTHORIZYD HY POSTMASTRR GOENEIRAL, OAWAS SECOND CJLASS MAIL). xi WINNIPEG, JAN UARY, 1916 No. 1 Editorial",
         "THE WESTERN SCHOOL JOURNAL onlly fair that the charges shjould be seriously cosidered. It is gratitylng to knOW that a nuxa- ber of thoughitful, earnest inen and wvo- mien have beeni at work on this Iuroblemn Edlucation in Canad(a and, tkhe United States, the Russell Sage Foundation, the U.S. Farmers' Bulletins, the Rdu- eationiàl Reviews, and other reliable publications. It is weill that people should be guided by patient thinker, and doers, by those who know tarir. life and appreciate farin needs. - ~wml ineet ii nipeg. The meeting will be thE important ever held by the assoe SSince itwiIl be more represenitativ any Previous gathering. There ar sev'entv lIni - --",
         "Chidren of the Year Janrw 011 ai gray, Like ail oid pilguitti by flic Way', Watchiig tlie suîo\\\\. a\"( ilSliveii, ~'Si gls, As flic mild tnt'lew roid liiiti flics; Or, Iînddffieul 1ittleviloatil a ti otui, Sits l'or ui li li h uge]tiI moli Fcbruary, bi tiff a uîd bol d, O 'er fîîrrows stirt(litig, scoriis flhc eofl; Alid îvitlh borlses two alYt'(st, MakesI ilie keei plow (Io its 1)ist. Rougb II\\arclt colies hlusteriîig dowiîi lite road, In his iatf-li biîtd fli oxen 's goad; Or, wifiî a rotîgl ai d a ngry haste, Scatters the secd ov 't lie itark -asl e. April, a cllîid, liaIf tears, liaîf sîties, Trips full of lit tic plai'1tu1 wiies; And, langliiiig 'neatli lier naitîibow l oocl, Seels flic wî 1( violet ii Ille mwood. May, the briglit miaideni, si uîinig gocs, Eacli day fromt car]y mont11 t0 eveiig ',-s close. Watching the lanîibs leap) ii flic dcli, List'ning to flic simple village l\u003eeli. June, iif the nîowcî 's scarlef face., Moves over thic clover field apace, And fast lus crcsccnt scythe swccps on O'er spots frorn whenee flic lark lias flow%ýn. July, flic fariner, happy fciiow, Laugis f0 sec the corn grow ycilow; Thei lîeavy grain lic tosses up Frorn lus riglif iand as froîn a ciîp. August, flic reapel, cleavcs luis way Throîîgl golden waves, aI, break of day; Or, 011 his wagon piled witii coin, Af sunset, home is proudiy borne. Septeinber, wifh lus bayitig homid. Lcaps fence and paie af every bound(, Amîd easfs info the wiind in scorn Ail caves and danger frot bis lîorn. Ocfober cornes, a woodtnan old, Fcniced villi fougli leather frorn the cold; Rouind swings Ilis stîîrdy axe, and lo! A fir-brandli faîls at cvcry blow. Novcîîbcr cowcrs before flic flarne, Blcared crone, forgcffing lier own naine; Wafclîes I li bIne siioke curling risc, Aîîd broods uponi old inctiiories. Decenîber, faf and rosy, sfridcs, Juis old hearf warm, wclI elotlcd. his sies, With kindiy word for youîîg and old, The eheerier foir flic bracing cold; Laîîgling a wclcome, open flings Ilis doors, and as hc dees if sings. lctd ('l 1 11, 1) 1, EN 0 V TI 1 E ý VA I?",
         "THE1X' WESER RSCHOOL -JOUIRNAI. Department of Education l'iTrFýOTIFC FI'NI This Lettcr S)asoi fP 1self NeepwaOct. 22, 1915 'lO the Tea chers- At the annual convention of the iNorth iCenrtral Teachers' Association a resolution w-as nnianiniotisly adopted that the teachers of titis association (this iflu(es the teacheî-s in the divi- 'Sions of Inspectors Herriott and Fallis) contribute at least One D)ollar per- inonth, to the, Manitoba Patriotie Fund. Althoughi these contribtiions are to be entirely voluintary, it is hoped that ail te-achers in these inspec.torates wvill avail themselves of this 'neans of sys- tealiatically stipporting a cauise xvhiclï desep-ves andi 1equires Our- utrilost lhellp. If vol, eal, sec your way clear to co- operate iii this inatter kindly fill in the enclosed forîin and return it with the firsi ' nonth 's contribntion to any Ont, of the following: Mrs. V. Cochran, Nec- J)awa; iss Olive Hall, Minnedosa; or Miss M. MeMa ns, (}ladstone. The executive trust that this appeal wvi1l ineet with a genel-ous response and that the, returns will be sent in prompt- ]y, about the lSth of each month. Sincerely yonrs, A. A. Hcrriott, A. B. Fallis. FA1IM MAN UAIL TRAINING An educational display of the above will be arranged at the coiining Eastei- convention. Teachers are asked to prepare sncb nIo(els specially adapted to farin uise in wood, iron, willows, grasses, or any other suitable mnediumn easily obtainable. Something for the house, the garden, the dairy, piggeries, etc. [t is desirable that only one, of each. partîcular object be sent, as the arni is to illustrate what eau be accoînplished with available inaterials rather than to collect a large number of sirn'ia,- iniodels. Cornyunicate wîth' W. J. Warters, director of Suinîner School of Handicrafts, Sehool Board Offices, Wi]- liain avenue, Winnipeg, and iielp to mnake this valuable to the indivîdual teach eî. HfOTI LUTNCH1 IlEA 1S SPREADING MUiss Jean Whitelaw of Rosser School iýs stili serving a hot îîooîï-day lunch, and reports that hier efforts along this line have been very successful. During thc rnonth of August the enrolment in Rosser was 38 with anl avcrage attenid- ance of 34.4. In September the avcrage wvas 32.8, and in Octobeî- 31.6. The lom- et- attendance for October is accouîlted for by the fact that two childreni moved frot the district during that rnonth, and another was siclç. Ou Octoboi- :\"1st, the day of the inspcctor's visit, thirty-six pupils were present. ,Missý Whitelaiv believes that the lunch. is a factor iii the excellent attendance. When one considers that this is a purely rural district, the attendance for the harvest înonths is rcrnarkabl e. Miss Estelle MeManus, of Ileadingly, writes this: \"'This is the thurd winter that we have been having the hot lunch. and 1I consider that it has been a great succcess. 1 arn quite sure that the pupils enjoy it, especially those whio cannot go home to lunchel, andi on storiny days îuanty who ]ive quite near the scbool re- main. ''We have a two-buî-ncr oul stove whiichi xas given us hy a lady in the dis-",
         "OUTLINES IN DRAW'INGS, triet w hjo, by the way, provides hll*i the oil required. 1 provide the other lia1,1, amd the total cost is about 50e a, montlh. Eacb famnily takes ifs turn in providing whlatever kind oif food we are t0 pre- pare, andti ei cost is about 10e cadie day. Occasionally we b ave aý rea I dial ner-, foi- which each faînîly brings au ariticl e of food eeed111)011 t lie pre- vious day. V. finci fiat the parents bave l)eeui very miuch irnferested aadf are only too glad to send whatcver usnedd XViy flot try t0 mwork 11p soietiiuïig along tis lac in yolir sehool ? SU(tUESTEI) ()UTINES IN 1)IZAWIN(' FOR JANUtARY ANI) VEIRUARY. 1916, I N RURAL S(IIOLS Grade D.-Wiie.Iesign and (on- struictioui. PraCuse ina king washws on 41 ich 1)v 6 inch paper, wvhicli eau be ls(*( for va rius purposes, freelhand. cu1ti ng. weaving, va lentunles, ete. This re nsintîch practice, as fhe cidren aire ineliuîed to work -with their brushes too drY, or not have sufficient paint mnuxed aI the commencemnent. Lantern.-Color a sheet of 6 inch by 9 inch paper wvith the three prinîary colors in rainbow effeet. At the next lesson make a fold leugthwisc along fie paper and cut (commnencing at the fold- ed edge) ý inch stripes fo within J an inch of the bottom edge. Open and paste at edge and inake a haudie. Make lîorders by folding a strip of inc b a inch paper into 4 or 8 sec- tios.Pii asimple unit ineach section andI band at top and bottoin suggested uinits, (lots, strokes, oblongs, etc., whicli should lx* lractisc(I at the blackboard and on )ah)er before commîencing fhe liorders. Grade II-Practise inaking washes an(l apply to a place card as illustraled on page 26 of Drawing Book, smail flags could be used instead of candies. Make borders aIld surface p)atterns on 2 inclh by 6 inch and 41 inch by 6 inch paper, fold int sections before applying fie unit, sec page '30 of Drawing Book 1. Practise inaking the *units on flic black- board and upon paper before applying to the final work. Grade III. Design and booklet. Wibli ruler and pencil practise inakiag sini- ple border\u0026 and surface patterns upon 3 inch by 6 inch aud 41 inch by 6 inch paper siinilar f0 those shown ou page 38 of Drawing Book IV, using vertic al and horizontal lines oulY. Let the final wvork be 111)011 previotisir t inted paper. A pply any of bice ideas to a bookiet 111)0) 41 inch by 6 iiach paper (tinted) . Make a n ai I-round pattera or- bauds. I usert lcaves, sec p)age 1l, No. 2 l)rawing Book. Grade IV.-Suriface patterns aud] bor- ders.-\\1ake pat terns sinilar to tiiose in No. 3 i)raw'ing Book, pages 20, 32, 34 an(l 39. Use for borders 3 inch by 6 inclh or 3 inclh by 9 inclh paper. For surfaces, 4-2 inch by 6 inch, previous1' tintcd. A ru1ler mulay be used for spac- ing oinly. Grade V.-Border and file. Practise maaking borders upon 3 inch by 9 inch Maîîulla paper, using oiy vertical ani horizontal lines. D)o uîot use a ruler ex- cepb for space îneasuring. Copy the whole upori prcviously tîîîbed Manila paper, using tints an(1 slia(es for fie color schenue. Tile.-Make a design for a file square, ob)long or diamnond 511a1)d, measuring ab)out 4 inch by 4 inch. Use ouly hori- moitai. aIl( vertical lines as far as possi- ble. Sec nuits on page 9 of 1)rawing Book A for ideas. The design siould be worked out finst, bien transfcnred f0 thec final pal)Cr. Grade VI-Tile an(1 border. 1 -'pou Maniilla paper practise filling spaces (about 4 inch by 4 inch) viti geoinetrie forms, using, chiefiy, vertical, horizontal and oblique uines. Sec pages 20 and 38 of 1)nawing Book 5. The final -work to be transferred fo colore1 papel. ali worked in greyed tones of aaiy primary or secondary colon wîti ifs conîpleaicu- tary greyed.« School ,Journal-Ga lley T'uîiy-4ive, Make a border upon 4, inchi by 9 inclh paper, using a similar pattern and colon.- mng.",
         "THEii W ESTIERN SCHOOL .JOURNAL Grade VII.-Mot to a nd surface pat- terii. IPractise lettering upon sqnared paper if p)ossible. (Thiis nay not be l)rocurable, if ýso, let the celass ruie their own qutarter-iiieli squares). See 1)rawving Book; 6, page 34. Select a short quotation or motto and })rint it in a rectangular shape upon tinted paper. (Plan the whole upon Manilla and trace to a fresh sheet.) Color according to the sehenmes mnade duirinig Novenîber. Make a surface pattern, using a, uni t made £ronm any flower or inseet. Sec pages 9 andi Il of l)rawinig,1ookc 6. Use 6 inch bv 9 i nch or 9 iinch by 12 inch Mlanila paper. Color aeeording t sehemes. Grade VIII.-Space filling and bor- dier or pattern. D)esign a border f'or a square, circle or oblong, iising ideas similar to those given on pages 7 anti 39 of Drawvingo Book 7, the whole to, mneasuire niot less than 5 inch by 5 inch, or largeî', and to l)C colored ae- eorcling to color sclmcmes w'orkecl dur- ing November. Practise, plan a i ( color the unit before wor-king it on the final paper. Make a border or surface pattern with sinlilar units npon 41j inch l)y 12 inch or 6 inch by 9 inclh paper prevuolusly tinted. Fnirthcr inquiries regarding tic work slionld be addressecl to: A\\1iss Ilewitt, Supervisor of Draw-ing. Sc'hool Boa md Offices, Winnipeg. Kind]y send stamnps for postago. WINTER SPORTS By IX51PECTOR D. S. WOODS, Miai Ti!ie problem of disorderly halls and elass-roorns causes the teacliers of graded sehools muchi anxiety during the winter season. There are pupils who prefer to Joiter inside, and tîmougli at times inclement weather prevents any goîng out this is flýot generally truc. If the problemn is present to any extent, it is s0 because facilities have not been providcd or direction given to outsidc recreati-on during this period of the year. For anothier reason ontsîde recrea- tion slmould receive more attention than it docs. The tendency is to over- heat and not properly ventilate the cla'ss-rooms whethcr the weather be exeessivcly cold or not. The physical and mental result is evideîit and the need of open air mecreatiom apparent. Some Suggestions L Organize from the inside, retain- taining the control and leadership. 2. insist on the loiterer going ont. 3. Make provision for conripetition. 4. Games ought to be of a strenuous nature and sueh tliat, ail wouldbe kcpt busy inost of the tiîne. 5. We should bcecameful not to do injury to pupils wlîo are unfit physi- ea]ly for strenuous play andi those who inay Dot be properly elad. 6. On colci days the juniors iiuughit he accommodated in the basernent or a vacant room if such places arc( avail- able and not too dusty. G ames 1l. Football for senior and inteinie- diate boys. Basket bail for senior bo0ys or girls. Dodge hall (snow ring) for initermne- diate boys or girls. Pomp-pomp-pull-away13, tag, eha sing the hare, etc., etc. Athletics-running events for bovs. Slide for juniors.-On many of tîme grounds there is a sliglit iniclinie whieh if ieed for a wvidth of 3 or, 4 feet anti a distance of 25 to 100 feet, would pro- vide a splendlid sheet for slidiing or bob-sleighis. Very little water is re- quired iii the beginning aud to keep it frce from snow wo,,uldl not entail a great ainount of labor. If there is a smial i bu] near by, follow- ing the suggestion given above, prepare a toboggan slide. Where there is no incline a slidc ]niight casily be ereeted, using 2 inch plank. A fall of three feet in flfty feet wvould be sufficient. The sehool rinkl.-Thle, inajority of oui- boys and girls skate. aiff those wvho (Io",
         "NOTICEý iiot would like to. Many cannot afford season tickets to the rink. I know of uîothing whieh brightens the play if e of the sehool more than the sehool rink. I feel that I cannot do better in deal- ing with some of the difficulties that confront one in undertaking this than by gîving my own exl)ericnce. 1. The expense of the enelosure. One 12-ineh ridge board is ail that is re- quired. The eost of this last winter around a rink 70 feet by 200 feet w'as $15 .00. 2. Getting the foundation ice. This is a simple matter if the town lias water works. If the sehool has a well whieh will yield 2 or 3 barrels of water at one time it can be donc if one utilizes the Parly snow falis. 3. Kecping the rink in condition. Or- ganîze the boys, into tcam groups and place theni in charge on alternate (iays or wvceks. A healthy rivahry will de- velop. I found that many of the boys would turn out from 8 to 8.30 a.m. that thcy might be up with the work. If there is a stream or pond near by use it. In Dauphin hast scason we hiad skat- ing almost cvcry day and hockey three times a wcck aftcr four. The rink was open for boys' hockey from 1 to 4 Sat- urdays and two evcnings a week from 7 to 8 o'elock. It was open to the junior public for skating from 7 to 9 four cvcnings, and from 8 to 9 two evenings per week. The total cost for lumber and electrie higlit amounted to $53.50. We had 7 boys', 3 girls', and two lady teachers' hockey tcams. Lif e at that sehool was worth living. So snccessful w'as the experiment that this season they havc opencd a rinlz on each sehiool ground. NOTICE l'le attention of teachers is 'ealled to sehools. Tt is suggestcd that there is, a 1 ie periodical ''Conservation,' \" vhich is great deal of material iii this p)amphlet îîow bcing sent out tf) ail the Collegiates. which may be made uise of froin day to Iligit, Intermediate anid ('oisolidated dlay. SIMPlLIlFlI ) SPELLTNG After a few wksat boardinig sehool -Alice wrote hoine as follows \"'Dear Father :-Tlo I was hornesick at first, îîow that I arn getting acquaint- 4vd I hike the sehool very maucli. Last evening Grayce and Kathryn (my room- mates) and I liad a nice little chafing (lish party, and we invitcd three other girls, Maylte andi (arrye Miller anti ÈE1dyth Kent. I hope you aie ahi well at boine. I can't write any more now, for I have a lot of studying to do.' Wîth lots of love to ill. Your affectionate daugliter, Alyss,'' To whieb she rceîved tlic following ]'eIily: ''My dear Daughter Alyss: I was glad to receive your hetter and to k-ilow that you arc enjoying yourself. Uncle .iaymcs came the other day, bringing ('hanls and Albyrt with him. Your brother lîcurie was delighted, for lie lias been lonehy without you. I have bought a new grey horse whiose naine is llyllye. 11e matches inicely with aid Freddie. With mueli love fromn us aiI amn your affectionate father, Wy-llyani Smiythe.\" Th'le îiext letter froin tHie hsî (liighteifoilsa sigied 'Aie",
         "THE WVE5'EUZN SC110OT. JoUltNAI. Special Articles WOOD) ('AIIVI NG' IN GRADEI) SCI1('IOL iiy iss'O iý. tý'A tiii0% It is an, easy ti)1lg foi' a skilledl cî'afts Ilaji with clill îvated taste to (I0 goo, wvood carving, but, to carve velJj w-bei on1e is onfl*y begininiig to learl how t lise tie tool)s is a very dlifferent iuqfteî It î'eîjiiîes so ilnuci thought aîid ;i)î'se ve'ance t o gulide the I ools arighit, t( preveiit tlieî 1'roin slipping 0!'- spo;lijii tie wvork, that oiie caninot wonideu tlin boy is veî'y often disappoiiitedl witl th,, i'estilts of bis efforts. WTood is soinething lilce buinan 'id- lire, delightfulfly hielpfui xvhen worki. with the grain, but the novice lias suceli a figlit against and across it, that it alinost bis the idea that he is seeking to express. Every niistakze, every thouightlcss, careless eul is there befoi'e bih îr yes. One of flic tlîings V have ijot ceaIsed to inarvel at is thiis: A boy is a i'eitrikalvgoodIjud(ge of his owiîhîand- wvork 1111(1 lie is ilot oftein satisfled ivith biis first attemîpts at woOdcarvirîg. le does not bother his lîead with the things stîî'romnding him ini the way of fuitîtjire, pictures, cinaii, etc., tlîat iii înany cases keep bis taste iunspoiIcd, hut-the moment 1iw begins to ia k soînetbing, it is qmnite anotiier story Ilien (tînless, of course, lic is obsessed ivith the'idea of furnishing the home, then it is s6metimes a case of quantity itot qjuality). Otberw5';ise, het'e lie -is colifronted wvitli soitetbing lie fias inade and tried to decoi'ate, idm the decora lion 18 et failure iii his eyes-uî bis eyes, not in mine. 1 eau sec tbat Jaek of technique is binderingl liîîi, and here is where the need Of cii- couragemlent coines ini. fil soilte caes it is only w'biei 1 tell, a boy titat it took Iirin long ycaî's to learn io ox f0 rite and that lie coines foi' voodcarviing for only one bot' or one hour and a lialf iii the week, thail f sueceed iii get- tino'g hua to lî'y agaîn with aiîy entliin- siasuti. Olne dIespairinig younlgsteî' said o trie the otbe' dlaye \"Wbye I eau 't ;-write wvel1 even ow,''but lie tî'iedI ýIagain at bis caî'ving, finuiling out, as the' ntajority of thein do, that it wvas 11o lise o) using his bands witb ail hi5,. imight. mîiless there was a vet'v tlîoitglîtfîii fi -Ied workiiîg \\vith thei. I aili511 you wvîll pardion ime qîtoting front a Manual Training magazine. A w'ïitet' there iii a, few liues expriesses so muuc betteî' than 1 eould, wvhat I feci. le sa .I''mp ressions mtadie 'x 1) aiiîe * iro\u003cliice deeper tboughts, lts iew~ resoluitions and enlergizi' w-il power', inere voî'ds have nio sucbi lasting effeet; by bis failures he gains a îuastery ove t' himse]f and thus unconsciously lays a, fouinda lion of souifd .judguîîeit upoti wlic1î lie cait build tbe superstructure of hi, life 's wo'.'It seetus to tue that here is the educatioual value oie w,ýoodcaritving iii the publie Nebools. Iii iio other lîand-wvork tbat 1 know of does wrong doing show, so plaiîily. Tbe boy 's (iestl'oying in oi'dcr to ci'eate. Il is sonmething definite he bas to dIo andti i uust bc donc wîitb care, or tie î'esults arc disastrons. Ile lias ilot vet acqirci-d mîîcl skill, oîlly coîîenitrateîî effort aud tbc wili to achieve w'ill lielli liiii at titis stage. The boy who iniost needs tbis w'oî'k is the cluinsy, sbif'tless lad, w'lîo does iiotbing ive]l, or the boy Who waîl 1' to ta le a nmode], hime ever v fu' w'eeks. rfbei. xvork is so, hopeless at fi'rst tfiat 0o1e looki at it is calculated to take away any conceit a teaclici' ia y posses-ý regarding bei' ability to teacli. But later, wben one sees tiiese b)oys beginning to work tbotight liiilv arl caî'efully il secîns to nie tbat somte- îting lias been achieved. Tlîey inusi île tho ' ougb, patient, pcrsevering andl just a little eager about the work oif theit' bands before there cati be any resîîlt -worth looking at. I quoted a few miomnlts ago sometliiîig about tite ltoY biii(i iig tb e stîpei-stiiettii'e of bi.N",
         "lifesý, work. Ilus life's Wok () rk always riscs Io t lie level of tlw woiker, neyer Iîiglîer, thaf is w-el! kiiowu. i nt to train a boy to give flionglit, tha t lie mnay (Io t-omnion0 tiîî gs uflcomiiiiof- ly well, ta hip hlî -eilcb a Iiiglieî- tevel of wvork, fliaf N an linipuî-î lit stej) iii character building. The, otiir inorning, a few minutes befoi-e i ne f w'as trying to.finish a ilucbi-ieu -ded filodel Il, suit wo(l. The fouis We I-e V el ry Sbal) andii slippieicsi OveIr gi-ollif (IwOi-k aiidl (lesîgul. (Suîîîc( few boys w-ere i thle î-uuîîî getting )lut w-uî-k. ( 'nscious thlat tbiey had gaflier- ed arotîîîd 111e aîîd gîown vei-y quiet, f luuked up) ani met the briglit eý,es uf the Maost res.tless boy iii tho as \"'I wOuuld gi-ce a liîndred dollar-s t a earve I ike fliit, ' lie sid, aiii d l(e \"if 1 11,1( if,' and lie was verv mil--h in earnesf. 1 fell this because'ut pic- sent he Ns not djoiiig very good wîîr. Iluw to make him- and naîiy athers uf his kind is iny prublein, lîow to Seizýý 0on thaf ncwly awakened inipuilsfý a iuil levelop if into rîglit action. tlq)lg fines Of coultilliluus effort is the idealI ]lave ever before ine. I can feach the craft of woulca iv- ing fu arîyuîe w-ho ehouses Iuo 'ii (andi to soimie tew xiii don(01t), but f0 tcachi the art of it is inother- thiiïig. 'l'O eut across anîd witlî the gr-ainî, to V foui uand trench o-ai l)e taujigbf, tO inake the surface of the xvork eoiim-ave and convex eau be tauglîf also, but that somefhiiug wblicli unakes tfli tîilî- ed work (or unfiuislied for- tiîaf lint- fer) very good f0 look, ,pou, coumes froni witbiiî. If seenîs f0 ne tii the art of a fhiîîg is tlîaf part of ourselvcs w'bich we give to allvfhîinlg ve dIo, or create. For instance, take tw-o muaids in a kitchen f0 xvhoni the înistress lias taught ail she kuows in the way of cooking. TihîIe one xviii disbi up1 a liin- ner fit foir a prince to caf, the oflier xvili use flic saine inaferials al seiîd up soinethiîîg that miakes une fhliirk life hardiy worfh living for the finli- beîng. Or one player wvili set cee's feeth on cdge w-ifh lus interpretafion of a favorite niiasfeî-, another wil give deep) deliglit. Two mien w'ill ýe1l la st(ii- oif h i\u003cl(l iiitea sure, on tiie omie liaiol -yoîî have Ille olîîîe lîuvelisf. unl I lie ut hei Rober i-L o îîis Stev-ensonî. Thie dlimne iovet ist, îiay be wmi ting gia-ai inlafica llv, it flie (lifrelei. I tIli ik th bis N wlîaf J1ohnî Riskiii mni s -wleiî lie saYS I î; w iiî bîa-le famiglîf hy fîîui-s, luIt desig il n N, hx- Ileavet.\" Wc mlax-b lefaghf to observe a tbling ando tiiei (Iii w, unodel, Or o-ave( if as flic case nîay lie, but f0 iîîferpref anohe- persois aiea s(iccessfulhv or sy i lpathbetica Ily (if onîy\\ inil piece of woodcam-viiîg) is a veî-v oiffei-eit fliing. Wheîî ari- assumies ca rvîiig as ifs gai-h if is appea I ig fa tlie seilse uf siglif and t ouclih iai-f ticuhari. If lieeoines a inatter uf feelinîg in moruie senjses t lia onic, fa i-ible ini ifs aîîpeau I eca use if is ahieui f0 iat 111e, if is er-aflul. I ali silea kig îîow otf thie a i-tist w h ex - l)r(\"SSe5 s 0Wui tIi-j floli tl iii x-ouol. Il)- ol(oeo1 tlîe Ar-f and ('iatt ut Woodcar-- ing 410111(1 iii concui-m-eifl xvîth a sfi-uig leaniiig fo tlie Arf, if une is f0 gret the fulîl dehîglîf of el-eafive voî-k. Ta' go on1 cai-xing uf ler peuule 's fhoughts, may eventually kili ail in- ferest andl no inutter liow feoble flhc effor-t at first f0 express aiieself if is i iîfiîlifeh lifett- fliam fo coiliiiiîîî- eujiy- iiig. If seeiis fo iiie11en(i ofli liesf w-avs tIo sfudy dlesignii 1 to learn somîe c-a ft or~ ofheî- fluîoonghîly. Tu fiiid ouf flic liitiations ut t hue iiateriul, to aduit une 's iens tIo ftic fixed coniions uof flic fouis and iiiafcm-iu s. ]l short, fo bcconic iiiastei- ouf theiii. But v-oit w-ill say \"What if une lias nuoda ' WelI, unc's effortfs ut, dcsigig niay bc feelîle and cinde af firsf, yef ideas xýil iiioubtedhy coice if une is infcî-ested, but I dIo nof thinki thley are inspiî-ed during flic plcasant irifeivai followiing dinuci-, tliey ai-c more likely fo be buif up by flic n-reîiiftiîig concenfr-- tlion of atl oui- faculfies. A fhing f0 ho noficed iii historie sfudy is that ex- pression fiîîougli ail tiînc lias iioved consisfcntiv fi-uni simpiile fu elabou-afe, fuhlow-ed Liv meaefiuîu and1( thaf flic been dung thie peruod w-len siinplici- f'y w-as flc eyîac hlou eau wc op, tu appiîela fe fhîoi-ughlv other peu- \\\\-()01) CARVING VÇ GRADFI) S(ý11001ýS",
         "THE WEsTERN SCHOO0f J.iOUR lNALi pie*s i(leas if we cannot express our ow.Good taste, sound judgrnent ai-d ideas will corne mucli quicker with tools iii the hand. In any case they wvi]l not corne without wvork and cx- p erinent. ''To design,'' said a master to me, once, ''is to give definite expression to an idea.\" fie did iiot approve of my desýigns when they wandered a cross the sheet of paper withoiut rhyme or reason. The things we trea- sure so carefully in our museurns and galleries today were designed and exccutedl by men with tools in their hands. Art lived in the workshop in those days; there were no designers as suc/i then. nothing but craftsmen. In other words the eraftsrnan wvas the designer. 'Je learned design throughi lis eraft. Concerning this tire great scuiptor, Augutste Rodin, has sorne- thing to say. fie says:, \"My princi- pies are the laws of experience.'' The conmbination of these principles cmi- bodie.s his greatest precept, namnely, that of tliinkling and executing a thing sîrnultaneously. lie extols bbe work- shop methods. Speaking of bleui lie says: \"'The apprentice passed suecess- fully througli ail thle stages of the work shop and becarne acquainted wibh al the secrets of lis handieraft. fie be- ganl by sweeping the studio and that alrea(1v taught him care and patience, which are the essential virtues of a workrnan. The mnaster in his buru -%orked before him arnong lis stu- dents, lie heard his companions dis- euss blicir art. What have we today in place of those splendid institutions w-bld developed. eharacter and intelli- gence siîîîlae(1 7 ' Il e coni- tinues, \" The wýorrshop) iinethod bliat is the rncthod whieli 1 preach today, as ernphatically as 1 eari, ealling at- thus. \"I aîn ait artisan.\"' The sehool ehildren go ont into bue world. We teacli thern rea ding, and laber on ail] bention to the numerous benefits an(] advanbages of baking up a variety o1f handierafts. Aside from sculpture and drawing, I have worked at al sorts of things, orruamentabion, cera- mies, jewellry; 1 have learnied iy les- ,son fror nmatter ibeseif,'' and lie, before whose glorious work men bare their heads ini reverence, finishes mimply the great minds of past and prescrit are theirs bo revel in, if they choose. We teach bhem \\vritirîg bliat soine da 'y power of expression înay corne il I hein; matiîeînaties to develop their reasoning powei-s,, geograpliv that they irnay kçnow somebhing of thc greatncess of the world in whiech thîey live. We teach thein something of the past blat they may learn to view the present in the long iight of istory. On, eoiiil go on indefiuiilely. and ]lave not we of the Manual ri1,11111lg rooms a higli ideai, also? 'Po kreep ever before the boys as tbey go through our rooins tue idea of bhink- ing of and exeenting a thing simiul- tanieously. It is sornebhing tangible that is given uis to (Io, soinething înost boys are deeply iii erested in, to beach them low bo work intelligently, to teaeh thein to dosiire perfection, neyer forgetting as we look on at their workç that unskiiled, fingers are trying to execute, tbat mmnd iii the making is br.viîg to express itself. SIONS 0F GOOD DISCIPLINE 1. Order and system rcign supreme. 2. Obedience has become a fixed habit. 3. Good habits are inculcated and practised. 4. Neatiiem, clcanliness, tidiness are rnanifest. 5. Absenîce of fiîss, noise, uneasiness. 6. I\u003eroper language and dcportmneît. 7. Self-control has become a law. 8. Respect for sehool property and hon est labor. 9. Puipils are happy because indus- trio-rs. 10. A congenial, friendly atmospherc. -W. Vanî Diisen, I.P.",
         "iLISTOIIY IN ELEMENTARY SCîîOOi. 1II'1()IN IX LEMIENTARY S'1 1 AI-e we geýl t , îig aiytiig l j 1 thie re- suits that ive deslir. in olir ii jtrork; iii fle Elemnutir v ScIlOOls -\\N7 e liax c four years of hi sfory teeîîgaccord- ing f0 flic prograili of' stu(les. Tiijs would scein to providle. il oppoît uuniitv for a good range o)f ivoi* ii tis ljne,. \\Ve have definite worIc froin text books, indicating ijrecisely howv iii iîeli lieut or ' is expecteci to be eovere(l n eaelî guade. yef, judging ftoîiii reî is i ee e in say flic Eîîtra ie eýx-aniiiiat joii, omir chilfiren fail I o got auîy jintel ligent grasp of eve*ii tin . oits,.tauîdînig eveîîts of ouir Englislî andl Canmîdiauî lijstoi-Y. In a 1îaîr ain inieiiiied to liii blame on iti Buifuance cxainîiiation itself. By lar f\u003c)o puouinjiejt a plae has, in my opinion, been. givel Io wliat ïs really Constitut jouai Ilistor « and Io) wars, their causes and rsis.If mi1e maay judge froin the actuial power of grade cighit pupils to îîîtcllîgentiy grasp the comnpiex pritîciples iiîvolved iii changes of governrnt, treaties a.nd events ieading up f0 and folioivingwa, ive must, perhaps regretfuhy, cOrne to flccocuso that the tiîne spent on1 the study of suieli hisiorieai events is very h argely a i'astc of firne. Trhis phase of historjeal sidy 1)e'o0ngs fo Ilic Iligli Sehool and( the upper grades even tiiere. Possibly, foo, Ilie pr'eise iiweiliia assignment of so iîîaîy pages peu11 gradfle from a tcxf book is niot wjthiout ifs defrirnental influcice. rfeachî ers are offert profoulndly iinpresscd ivitii the necessity of eovcring the ivork si- cd. This may or iinay not be tiieritori- ous, if depends upon flinîefhiod of iii- t erprefing thaf purpose in actuuîl teacli- ing. The programn provides no clue as f0 what portions of the hisfory are of most value f0 pupils in fhe Elernent arr sehools, and probably feachers forgef mueh that they learnf in the Normal Sehool rcgarding this, s0 fhcy usuaiiy follow the f ext very closcly. This in ifself might be ail riglit if ahl fcachers had a senise of proportion. lu actual performance if works ouf foo oft tii 111 baili evejits, whi1( iîipûii or iliillfll)orfa lit, ivhefher suit ahie to pupils o f the age taughit or inol are t akeil 111) s vsteinl îeaily witl tllw saie degret' of elliîîalsis. Pl puls toi low t lir I ae Inr îhe lack of peispee- t ive. -Ail evusare of like iiiiportaniee or uiinil)oitanc-le. thec sanie tîiil level 1i rlloiigliolit. TEue 5il)ieiiie iiol-al vaille tlit eoles fiîoiii a nual stuldy of tile silliffle prii t ve lie onI the pioîleelr days, a îî( froli Ill e lire si ories of th e grreai Ille]) an (I xvoiieii ivi() IliaVe 11iad(e oniw eolijtir and lo'st lit 1-te preselit inefiiod of I euellinîg Il istrnvY. As Ifi\\uay sa y , \" Foi' hli stoi-V so vahuiable as the I)i()la-i lhies or oi Sii mdy pionieeirS.\" I fear that history asý taîîght iii too îiianY of our sehools is aliinsi profit hess. Personally, 1 11n1 satîsfied tla t the histories of Canada ani Thîgiand pro- vide ablîndaîîce of thie bcst kind of nia- terial for elenîentary schools. Ail flhat 15 needcd is prioper selectioti aind( salie tl-eatîiient. i n vieiv of theilexpiec of inaîi v ot ouir teaiellers 1 ani eonineedf ilat if ivoild be a, step iii flic righit direct jol to bauve tol)ies, i argel v bîo- grafphnii1, sel eeted foi- stii iii ea 1ch Tb e.'iese eouhd be iîsed ibstan- tîlY on hIe present t exis w'itl refer. licels Io otiier siiîpheiieitary booOks, Ilee i 1) iii III.V veiv.N exeeîllenîil ls- toi..\\ i'ea ders 110w publlished t ia t ahuin- \u003c lanîce of sU))euiit inaterial i oul(l 1w availabie even to a rural teachier. Iii grade eiglif fuis planî of assjgii- nient of topies rather thanl pages of text books ivould lcad, 1 arn eonviuced, to a iiîînelî more intelligent grasp of the ma- terial sfudied. Some really intensive study of sîîitab1e historical material would be possible. If studied ivith a realsonable wealthi of detail if would bie p)ossible, îîay even probable, that pupils miiglit corne f0 love history and f0 ad- mire flic hîcroie men and women wlîbo have contrihuted to the upbuildiîig or our nation. The study of such hlistor.y",
         "THE WESTERN SCHOOL JOURNAL tenids to the Iîighest forîn of patriotism, tiiot flnds expression iii worthy sel-vice anid surely there can be nîo questionî as to the rîeed of developing wvit1îin our boys, and girls a sense of social andi political responsibility that will leaci thein to serve willingly their oAn day and generation. -A. W. THE SPELLING -BUGBEAR iY JOHN HENRY LEGCOTT If, ivoîîd i adeed be niost regrettable if mnany teachers ivere found to agree wvith the writer of the article under the captioni ''The ('urse of the School Life.' One iniglit hie l)ardoiie( for thinkjýing there inust be SOIne special reason for al' antagonisýtic attitude so stiûong ilgainst the spelling of Englishi words.* No one ean deny the existence of the spelling (wil. rlhe resuits of examina- tîoyns at sehlool aimd college, wliere so inany students are conditioned iii speli- ing indicate a very serions trouble mhich shnould long ago have received ftie attention of educationisfs. The sys- tein at present iii vogue is undoubtedly l)ioducing bad spellers, galore. Not onix' is the defeet found in the w'ords that are not plîonetieally spelled b)nt frequently words iii coinnon uise are mnis-speit. W. S. L. fiîîds thec bugbear in. ftie woi'(s titrînselves an(l fails to give consideration to the possibility of flic source of the mnischief l)cing found ci sewhcpc. [t secîns f0 tlic Jreseiif wi-iter there is far more justification foi, swearing at fthc spclling-book-an antiquated in- stitution that slîould be put on flic scrap Ileal) without further delay-rather tiîai af the spelling of the words; or finding fauit wvitl the teaching radier than ,the taught. A miore improfita bic sysfem than that of asking children to commit fo rnemory listit of uncon nected and unassociafed W ords eould scarcely be devised. If approaches as near to eruelty as anything in sehool life that liais conie within the experience of the writer and coiîflicts entirely with al tie bcsf canons of feaching. With ftic adoption of a rational sys- fei of dealing with, this subjeet a difi- gent teacher ivould have I ittle difl'jcult 'N in ina king a t Icii st niînety per cent. *of the pupils correct spellers, of fthe xvords they won1ld commnonly uise, and, in the uiaking, xvili not have disgusted their youîîg charges witli lahîguage and al its allied subjeets. The flrst objeet to afin at ini aîîy chiange of sysfem is to remnove the ele- ment of uncertainty fromn the minds of botli teachers and fauglit. The feacher should know for certain the extent of thie vocabulary whichi it is expecfed flie pupils should be acquainfed withi at flic endi of the successive ycars, ani the pupils, too, should know deflnifely whiat is re(Inired of them. For this pur- pose if is suggested fliat flic grade readers should be taken as a basis. The first reader, for instance, will contaiîi (Jiite a nuinher of words which to tli' youiig student xvili be altogether un- familiar at the beginiîîiig of tlie year. If throughouf the year thaf reader be carefully and skilfully uscd by the teacher, ecd day fthc pupil will be- corne acquainted witli an increasing vocabulary. The chuldrcn, knowing that fhe words in tijeir reader, and those xvords alone, xvili be uscd in their spelliîîg examnination, tlîcy xviii endcav- or to inake sure of them. Any feacher xvho is up to the inark. will be able fo use flic voeabulary bctwecn the covers of flhc book in sueli a inanner as to in- ferest the pupil in flic study of words, flic use of mliich to thein woinld become a real joy. Passing on to flic ncxt grade an addi- t ioîal I n inber of words li be in- cludcd iii flic text book, but stili the definiifeness of ftic requiremnents, leaves flic child in no doubt amui rcinoves froin flic mid flic eleiient of surprise. By iisimîg only flic liniited vocabulary of f lic grade a nd ftie preccding grades of eoîimse-ijn coinposil ion cees",
         "THE S('flOOLIIOLSE IN THE EVENING pojiversational. Icssoii5 and writteil work, the eye, the car, the voice, t1w lîand, eachi coiîfribute tlieir share to- wards înaking the words familiar and the mental association of the words with things and sights agrecable, causes thcm so frcqueritlv i o rucur thia they gradually beeomie part of tlic fui-- nishings of tlic child 's iiimd. The vocabulary of the suppleîncntarY read- crs shioiild not ffiier into thic examlina- tionl in slpelliîng, l)ut mlighit he used bY thie tcachcr for the bcelping of flic nore advaîîccd stdî t 7 Uder no0 enrcini- s tane,- shoifl catch, mords be itro- iliiee\u003cl. Devices for the purpose of se- ('11rinig the constant recurreuce of flhe sanie wor(l iu correct form but iii varied associations are fainiliar to ail good tea chers. Pupils who have l)assed thirough flic lîrimary and sccoîîdary sehools uîidcr a svtmof fuis kiîîd, sbould they go to the college and urîiversity, will not be found disgracing theinselves or their teachiers, by their irnability f0 write or 5l)cak their mnother fougue correcfly. Thiey -willI have acquired sncb facility iu the use of words thaf they -%vill. be iii- clined to smnilc at the 'tirades of spelliug reforrni(rs like W. S. L., wlio so infem- iiciately dcniouîîces thie ' I\\onster ' of Eîîglish Spelling. A bad-spelliîîg tcach- er c;innot niake a good-spelling pupil, and no greater injustice eau be inflicted ou a sýcbool. of chljdren than to place iii charge of it a teacher who canuot spel coiricetl.N and( wb'o lias s0 ncglectcd the c(lucatioIl of the eye thiat dozens of mis- takes eau escape attention wlîen look- iîîg over the work of the several classes. fil orldcr thaf siuch a suggested plan mnay be adopted if would be necessary for the teachiers of the Western Pro- vinces bo induce the Provincial legisla- turcs to so alter their school and college curricula iii respect to spelliflg as to bring into range a rational system as above (leseribed. (1ould thiis be aceom- plished, what hearf aches would be sI)ai'c( Whiat arîxiefy and turmnoil would be falzen fromn the teaeber's lifel rpcaclîeis should bear iu mind that -a comlplefe education predicates the cor- rect use of the hand, the eye, the car, the voice. To write badly, to speli. bad- ly, fo spcak badly, to rcad badly, in- dicates a dlefective educat ion. Eu- deavour, therefore, to approach as near as. possible to the character of a well- rounded, wcll-grolm(fled auid coniplete ianii or wouian. TIIE SCIIOOLIIOtJSE IN T11E EVENING Every towîîi should have a coînmuîîity centre fliat is meeting the social ueeds of the people and directing the fhought of the commnunity. As such work is ac- lcnowledged to be an ''extension of public education.'' why shîould not the building wherc public education is be- gun. be iîtilized f0 continue cducatioîîal growth arnong those who have long sîincc gradulated from a public scllool? The schoolhouse is as niuch a public institution iii the evenîug as it is in flic tlaytime, and lu evcry comrnunity a wider use of the equipmeut of the scliool. lant is desirable if if bas ail auditorium w-ifh conîforfable seating capacity or a .social roule. To aîîîtcipate social uceds mauy conniitfccs on the furnishiiig of new schools arc iîîstalling riow onlv inovable furmiture. \\Vhie controlling boards have heen hospitably incliîucd toward outside or- ganizations flic latter have been glad ti nake -usc of the sebiool building. lit rural comînunifies, villa ges, f owns and cifies where flic use of the sclioolhiouse is, obtainable ifs hospitalify lias hecu aeceptc(l by farmers' insfitutes land granges, inothers' clubs and parent- teacher associationîs, faxpayers' ani fownimprovenîent associationis, women's civic clubs. bousewives' leagues, orches- tra, choral. and oratorio societies, art clubs, natural history sociefies, Chanî- f auqua circles, liistorical societies, Boy Scouts, (Camp IFire Girls, and other oî- ganizcd bodies. Whilc ail of these organizations have hield fhieir meetings miainly for their owiîl iiemblers, îulany of thiein have co-",
         "THE WESTERN SOHOOL, JOURNAL \u003cJleiatc(l witIî school authorities iii pro- vidiîng erîtertaiiîg aet ivities for th~e enjoyrrneni of )ersotis who are flot 11cml- bers. A good illustration of thîs eo- operation was, givenl in a city ini New York State wliere the Federation for Social Service w,ýorkec1 witli the Board of Education and startcd neighborhood associations at three of the public schools. At the mieetings of thcse as- sociations they diseusscd sucli subjeets as, ttubereuilosis, sex hygiene, bird life, and travel, and liad a Iso musical inum- bers aiid reeitatiolis, elosing the cvcning hy serýivîg refreshîaients and Iiaving so- cia] chats. The arrangement of public lectures of an educational eharacter is facilita- tcd in several states tlirough the circu- lation of lanterii slidcs from the Statc Dcpartmcnts ýof Educationi. The, ex- tension division of one statc univcrsity not only boans lantern slides, but is pro- viding motion ilictitre films. Thc sehool. as a centre for the comn- munity opcns the -%ay for the dcvclop- mrent' ot latent talents, and there is a wvide field for- tlic dcvelopmcnt of music, art, debating, litera ry, seientific ani do- mnestie clubs. A girl wvill willingly sl)en(l lier tiîne to lcariu to sew if she eau mnakc a stylishi aibeit simple drcss for hiersclf, and sue wvill gladly join anr cmu- l)roidery clubi if it mneans that suc wvill 1)c tautght to embroider a prctty collar or a cover for ]ier dresser. The value of a centre whcrc ail tire people of a eoîiuunity cari meet on a fricndly basis and cither play togetlier or lcarni to do work tbat to them is pas- time cannot bc cstimatcd ini moncy. An amateur orchestra lcarning the latcst 1)opular airs, a boys' club studying the mysteries of wircless telegraphy, and a group of adults listening to a wvcll- infornicd speaker on ''('itizeuislip,'' gathered in a schoolhouse under tactful leadership, will resuit ini a force for the 1)etterment of the cornimunity ini ability aiid in happiness. In a New Eiglaid towii of six thous- air(l popullation it was dliseovered tlîat, left to tliemnselvcs, ini spite of a goodly taaîouiiît or play space ini back yards. Op)eit lots and p!aygrouinds, the sixteca)- year 01(1 boys an(. girls, especially the girls, w(*re foîîîid in greatesi numbe~rs i(lly s'Il lte ring le streets of the town. '1h et lb le sclîoollbouse ('u 1aJshouhi bc inadc aiu attractive '\"Evening Ceni tre,'' as it is called in oiîe loeality, is flot liard to sec. It mnay bc a new tiiouglît to socil workers that boys and girls get into ruts ini their play, but the larger part of the boys and girls iii this, particular towli know bcst only four games: the boys, football and baseha Il; the girls, hide and seck and tag, The gaines likcd bcst l)y boys and girls arc those requir- ing runnîng andl throwing, gaines that caîl for physical strength and quickç- ness of thought. rflcr arc scorcs of excellent gamcs that eould be made popular and could be played in the schoolhouse in thîe evcning. If a new interest in. gaines could be tlîus estab- lished not so many ehiildren would spend the early evening ini the streets. In deciding what forni tuis cvcning- centre work or play shall take it must bc remembered that the nature of social life is sucli that it cannot ho tlîrust upon people from the outside. .I1 miust bc the life of the people theinselves or it is not social life. The United States Bureau of Education, througlî Mr. C1larence Ar- thur Pcrry, lias advanced somte funda - mental principles that xvill be helpful in stuclying a community's necds and planning for its social life. Hie says that as a rule all group life -whliose inuer workings will bear wvide publioity meets. wholesome humalî iîeeds. The activity wlieh any eounpany 'of people hcartily, public]y and unasha- nîedly sceks affords the precie kind of expression which, more than any other, it needs at that time and at the parti- cular stage of developmcent, its members bave reaced. Is *yj0ur sehoollionse used in flic even- îuug? If not, is your eommunity gctting Ilie 'fîti beniefit of its investinent?",
         "rImisON PR ACT ICAL GEO (FRAPI-IY Gcographyv is omie of the studies oit I lie prograîielt that requires a great ainouint of 1repairation 011 tlie part of Illc teaclici. The old ineflod of l 'h votir text books, read secti oni, 9, 10, 11, page 41.'\" lias pa~sse(l a'«a.. Tie teaeh- er as '«el as thie p)Upil stndies geogra- 1)hy. _Whcn 1 hinar a clîild sav lie is- lîkes gcograII)by., I examine mily text book. subjeel. anîd liyself. 1 askin y- self: \"Ain 1 îiiaking, this subict of vital iliterest toi the ehiildl? In iny rooîîi 1 have the flrst five gyrades. We have grouped grades four anid five foir gcýograpli-\\. At present -'«c aire stiflYîing the Dominion of Canada. Wilenl wc stiffied the Drainagre i read lI heii stoî'îes abiout the explorerq in1 Caniada. 1% cl child liuîted maga zinces a iîîlpae anid read articles, too. Tliei 1 \u003clie' a Inal) of Canada on ('liesec]otli. This is for flie nafural re- tîe.The cild(rcn takc great de- li uzht Ili briligiîîg tlic articles to scliool -nud g-i iiiing thein on the clotlî. In1 vo-yelatiuii witi comnposition, wuv W'«tues oîy 01Ille Yar1iOis resolirces. C r-ade 111. join ii l'or tlie wî'itteîi work, ('rades 1. toi V. for the oral. Iii eonnec- lion wi.th study of cool, the ehuîdcren askfber prents, they go to ili mer- (hauts and find oui where Uic eoal '«as b)ouglit. also the price paid for' il. Thley ac ery inuch intcrested. Weac stli(yiIig gold nexi. Oiwe of the rate- ia ,vers '«ho livcd near Dawson Cit.v verY kindlv offercd to give us a i alk on Gol d Mining.'' 1 amn inakîiig a serics of autobiogra- puyi sketches or ininerals. rrlese i place on filc an(l use in (J rades Il. and 111. as snpleneuîaryreading. Lilian E. C. Irvine, Chinook, Alberta. lIE WAS NOT READING The principal liad just been appoint- c(i and on fthc f lird day left the rooin '«here lie '«as tcaching flic higli scliool pupils fo sec '«bat -%vas going on in flic în'imary i'oorn. Miss C. liad flfty-six pupils, abouf hlf of themin the First Reader ant ei othier hiaif iii flic Second. This, flic advanced class, werc on their feet rcading-at lcast Miss C. incaîi if f0 be reading. Supt. G. sot do'«n and fook up a book so as f0 appear îîot f0 bc '«otcliing the t eacher; lie becarne iîitensely inferesfcd, lîowcver,mi the afteînpfs of George Cody to interpret flic hicroglyphies bef ore hia. Champollion neyer '«orked liarder over tic Egyptian monuments. The sf ory Nvias in substance fliaf a Mr. Brooks liad bouglît a, liose and liod niovcd int o if:; there '«as a parloir, etc., a barn and a garden. ('Iharley Brooks. w-as del igh e cl, etc. George wa's fen years olti anti liad a good face, could evidenfly run, caf. sleep, and undcrstand matters in gener- ai ecînal f0 most boys; buf, in spite of ail fliaf, lie moade 10 lieadway in inter- prcfing the syîîîbols before him. Supf. G. askcd in vain: Wlio is Mir. Brooks? Whaf had lie boughit? Who is Clîarley Brooks? The boy had uftered tlic 'ords, \"'Mr. Brooks hiad iately bouglît flic house iiider the clin trees at thc corner of flic strecet,'' julst als lie mighft have rcpcatcd a sentence in Latin. Othier pupils ini turn took up port ionîs of flic story about Mr. Brooks ani bis house, and thougli some did beffer thain ofliers, ycf thcrc '«as no iîîteresf cviuîced iin tlic various matters dcfailed; aîîd yet fliese '«ere interesfing to Supf. G., in fi lic began fo fhink Mr. Brooks '«aS. al prcfty hiappy fcllow. \"I1 know you fhinki they arc pretty 1)001 readcrs,'' said Miss C. \"I do not think tiîcy rcad at al l don'f think George Cody reads ; and I fhink ail the finie lie aîîd ftic class speîiul iii flat '«ay is '«asted.'' \"Trfhey '«ill lcarn aftcr a, '«hile 1 sup)- pose.'\" 4 don' t flink fley '«iii learui by do- ing '«liat fhey haive donc tlîis ilormnig; 1 hiope theý wvi1i w'asfc no maore of tlieiî' fiie iii tliat '«ay. Tiiat is not î'eading,",
         "THE WESTERN SCHOOL .JOUJRNAL nor is it the w'ay I iîcy learn to rcad.\" \"That is the way it is uisualiy doncl. '' \"Tt is the w-ay tiiiie is wasted. Sup- pose now, George hadl been dowli the street and toid I bat Mr. Brooks ]had bouight a hoinse anîd that Ilic hlad corne l)aek aiid told yoit; yoii would cali that talking. Now ilistead of going doxvn sti cet lie turns to a book and gets the inforumationî and tlien tells you, that is î'ea ding. There is very littie difference; in both cases there is au expression of what is iii tbe id 11e (lifference is in the, way the kimowý]edjge is gained. 1)id George say to you o111 of the book about Mr'. Brooks wiîat le w'-ould if lie imad gained tlie faet dowii street\" \"Certa inly not. I see wiiat o mleanl. 'Tmen T wviil go uip stairs aami This wvas the beginniîîg of iiew mîlove- mnents in the ''First Prîav'of 1M . Miss C. now began to thiaik about teacli- ing; she had up to tiiis time very patiently and industriouisly and con- scientiously been foi Iowiîîg a routine. WAR SKTHSFOR TIIE CIIILDREN Bulgaria There is a range of molnlains in south-eastern Euirope known as tIre Bai- kans. Hlere or close at halld you will find a group of littie nations-Bulgaria, Servia, Roumnania, Macedonia, Greece, Montenegro, Turkey. Look this up on the nrap. The story of Bulgaria is fui]. of intercst. Tt shouid be kmiown. by al Cana dian chidren. Anyone who lias travelled ini Bulgaria wiil have noticed three things-the por- trait of Mr. Gladstone, the great Eng- lish leader, in the cottages of the peas- ants; the monument to the Czar of Russia in the market places; the hate of the people for the Turks. And yet liulgaria lias taken arns against Eng- landt and IRussia and is. now eo-operating with the Turks umîder the direction of Gerniany, and ail because King Ferdi- nand has turned traitor. Long ago there werc in Bulgania fille palaces, and the ruiers sat on ivory throiîes decked with pearis anid goid anil \u003ciamoiids. Then carne tîme Turk aimd overran the land. Buigaria and the other littie nations were crushed. Their greatness passed away. Themi slowiy one of the five hegan to grow again. [t was Bulgaria. Suc set up sciîools an(I churches, and at iast becanie so strong that Turkey began to take notice. She did what Turks have always donc iii sucli cases. She order- e(t a massacre. No paper wouid dare to priit, ail that eould be said about this niassacre. 'l'le road-sides of Butl- garia Ivere heaped witli bu lim1anî skullis and skcletons, babies were iayoîîeted, homnes destroyed. The, riewIs iPeimer England. Mr. Gladstone w-as at tue heiglit of his power. The Turk mnust go, lie said. The butchen of Constanti- tiople mnust find a boule bcv.ýond the, Bosphiorus. So the powers of Europe met at last. Russia %vent to w'ar xvith Turkey to save Bulgaria. 'Sho shed the 1)lood of 50,000 ineri at Plevna. [nt 1878 she signed a peace at Stepimanlo, which left Bîigaria free. Thîis was tue happ.y endmng to one of the world 's saddest stories. This is why Buigaria wriote- these words to England: \"'If ever the Buigarians breatiic aga in, if ever they sueceed in throwing off the yoke of siaveny wvhiehli as weiglîed on tueur for five centuries, if evem' they ac- quire the nîglit to live, îlot as a nation of slaves, but as a free peopile govenn- ing thernselvcs, the houîour of flic achievernient will be dlue in tlie greatest imeasure to the noble Emigiish people.\" This is the story of Buigaria, and thc Imesent action of King Ferdinand iii eailing lis aiy to overrumi littie Servia is the action of a traitoi. Tue other day five I3ulgarian l' ariacîs waited on1 the king and told hiari wvat thc end of it ail would be, but lie is a Geriiiau ai. heart and wvouffl îot iistem. Nevertme- Jess, th(c end willj coine just as tiiese five mcin said. King Ferdinand xviii ]ose blis thromie. ; is couintry xviii ]ose its pliace aiiong tlic nations, for iii fliis",
         "RANDOM SRIOTS IIANI)OM 8IIOTS It lias ofteni been said, and it is prett.y geinerally truc, that a sehool teacher eau bc ''spotted'' on sight. Tcachers, iii- dlividually and iii the bulk, seemn te carry about themn a sort of mental ci. spiritual inusk by -%ich they mcvy be kit once distinguishied froin ordinary p)eople. This sceins to be muchi more potent in the female of the profession titan ini the maie. As a. mie lic rubs elbows, bis oM-1 auid others, more thanl site, and( tlitis ac('u!Itlates. froin varions sources, many influences that tenîd to eolinteract tie p)iquan1t class-rnark cf the teaclier. Let this bc as it may, it i', safe to say that ail teachers have thiis mark it greater or lesser pctencey. So it shall tow IX' niiae(; aiîd for want of a better imaitie let ns eall it the Arona of Eritiitionl. L~et us noxv consider this Aroina. This appears to be difficuit for' the reason that vie are itot dcfinitely certain of just what vie are trying to conisider. But when we recolect the many con- ventions and other teachers' gatherings vie have attended this wiîl recail to our mm.nds just vihat the Aroma of Erudi- tion is. The itext step is to set forth ltow it is, and why. To understand how it came into beitîg we must turu our thoughts to a consideration of a few theories (any will do) ; then to a few practical things. We mttust do this iii order to sec exactly boy easy it is for ns te consider theories; and how~ Itard to understand the practical. As a broad indication of why thîs is thus vie may take another (the first for many years,' ne doubt) look into that cîninent Philo- sophy of Education by that cîttinent Johann Kari Friedrick. Rozenkranz. On page 26 vie find as a forin of education, this sublime theory, \"The mind must estrange itself from itsclf, s0 that At may place itself over against if self as a special objeet of attention.'' This is delicious. Tite Normal Sehool prefes- sors, and no doubt înany public sehool tea chers could explain this passage to the satisfaction of everyone conccrned. Of course no one would then be any viser, but that is not even expeeted. On the other hand, vihen Bill Joncs, asks a teaclier 4Wbait 's tite mattel' w ith 111y boy. Ile 's not leaî'nimg at sliool ''\" the teacher catt itt ansm-er hua tîtat is, net wittomt paviing the air for a fi'w theories. i\\iid Bill îevei' dees know t\u003cIiat is wriig with his boy. Teaehem's are reared on f00 mnany theories thiat lack practical sense. Just imaginîe an office iiana gel' o'deing lus steiiogi'aphei' te isola te h erseif front lter- self se tliat she nîiighit place herself ever against herseif (or hiti it ntight be) as ai special object of consideration. 0f course, there is just a chance that she niight bave one(, heei a teacher ' in whicli case, site would undei'staiid hua exactly ani jiroceed te ebey. Othei'- wvîse, if výise, she would cali foir pr'otec- tien. What reasen there is iii requestiiig that teacheî's, aîîy more than grain buy- ers, or bartenders, or any other class of people, estrange themselves ft'oîn thtemselves aud place themselves ovri against thmnselves, is rathem' more than the mmnd cf man eau fathom. Stili, being teachei's, wc are ready te listen te anything se lonîg as it seunds cont- i)hicated, theoretical, andI fot tee prac- tical. If cm' trustees once get ''vise' te this penchant of ours we should al be more nearly ruicd than vie are. They would only need te speak te us thus: ''Yen are i'equested te separate the salary yen ask for fromn itself, ami place it over against itself (for sub- traction) as a speeial objeet- of omît conisid(eiatien ; vie unaniînously anîd nualiciously, andi( vice-versa, havtno, in- tentions te curtail saine p)iogt'essitwiey and eoriitiuouisly, ' and w''venul reply hereicai]ly thusly: ''Kismet! Kiss mie.'' The A'orna cf Eruditien is made up, in varying pr'oporttions, cf the follow- ing things: A. A caif-like venei'atien cf the Teat of Tlteory. Explanatieît-'And behiold! thîey set np false gods, and worship them.\"l B. A badly foeussed Idea of Self. After having been spoon-fed on tlteory for some y cars lu sehool, vie pass- ed our theoretical examns. There was a tiîue eaî'Iy iii Our school career whiuie",
         "TR-E WXESTERN SCIIOOT. JTOURNAL we eoiideniilied soîlie of mir St îîdies as (o rise )i 1 tea clie bile iiig h orifip(l W Stnlek to it,\" 'iaid( fitiially ieee( iii i1iiirzînig 'Sufticeîeit woi'ds on thle 41 I0 use\" subJec-ts tu sitecessfully (le- liile ouirselves aid otiiei-8. Di)rinig tiiese sehlool, days, ]astilig fil] w-e w\"ere very wisc andl matur-e ('sa v 16 years of age) we prol)abiy did iiot nîcet one real tact of life; btut we passed ai oui- exa uns. In tfhis -way tiie a ll-iiiiportance of thie Scliool 1-0011) beew iie paî11t of us8. ITpon goiiug to NToriml Seliool we were fithier assiu-c thiat as litealiers w e weîe Diviiueiy ( 'ai led ; tiiiat the tea ehiiiig irofessioji -was t1le ioblest or i] e (ýIli ings. If w-as so noble iii tact tha it \\ve .were not to tlîrîîkc of sa] a iya iiie vulgarity-buit to let ouir mn(s dwell on our (florious 1rîviieges as i cacheis. So we then knew tiit w-e reilly were noble, grand, Iofty, and evcryliîing of flie sort. We had only suspecfcd if before. The plain truth, of course, is thiat tcaching is no more noble, (ete., titan washing dishies, or cutting a cord of Wood. Sccing that practically ail our pupils after leaving sehool are go- ing to engage in such occupations as roeking cradles, runninig engines, kili- ing pigs and ehoppimg ývood, whîat (Io voit tliuki we ouight bo do about if? C.* A tofal]y uufoeussed idea, ol 'Piugs as They are. Teacliers haviuug of nieccssity isolated thieunselves, inid and body, front the wvorld of men, womneu, and tlîiugs, and huricd themselvcs, icntally and spirit- ually, between the covers of books, naturaily eau niot kiiow Life as if actuial- ]y is. In this they arc like preachiers. But they kniow their laek of worldly wvisdorn, aud tcachcr-likc they l)Ioceed f0 ''rcad-up.'' Siînply more theories- 'as thcy speedily discover when they try to \"mix\"~ with men of the world: comîmercial traveliers, bartenders, bar- bers, conduetors, etc. These \"ordin- ai-y\" men can give \"thein cards and spades,\" and ''beat fhcun fo if'' every fime. So feachers are gefting \"Wxise\"' fo,,this condition of affairs. There are soune wlîo are making if their dufy fo ''mix'' in ail kiuîds of eomipany in order f0 gef ouf of. thaf terrible place, the t(-aeliei- s it. Oile eîa1iiieiit te, l. ini tii is \u003erovi lice skiîd îîof long'. ago thlat lie 111ioiglif a g(iod gaine of Poker-b-o V eda ia ii. So lie ' sat iîî7 ocasi.oiliviN 1). A Glod-like d sdaiui of -Dit (on poi or lulaeksui itlîs, far1mers, grave- diggeî-s, baiigmcn, etc.) For- a sornewhat exteiided frcatment of. this. read ''13Book of Snobs,'' by Mr. W. P. Thiackeray-; also Gcuiesis, ch. L. I f.. ilIL, arn lic i-eest. E. An ' awvfully sweef' applreeiatioii (.o ehe)of flec Beauitifll 'iili the ( \" l1 ''''in Nturie,'' \" in JLiterati-e., 'iii Muisi c, Drwaîa, Painfiitg, Seul pture, lùifi ,liciccie. and 1'uarig 's I)î- ilig B'ooks', rE'lls refeis fo flic rlti- sile of, flic attauiilieîufs of tfli e achci. TIile Bea îîltifiuîl 'îVhat a filnid ýof a- of tule- whla tyouiiiaycallit, the woi-d contairis. 'l'lie Beautfiul a Love of the Beautitul. \"iin the eýhill,\" ' ii'li Nafuîu-e, ' in-ai)(l so on iii ail fhînigs inciiidiuîg even wasli tubs, inîd fobacco (iineli ouly). llow flic far-iner should love flic beautiful in the inoss-grown. iron-bound bueki-et witlî whichi lie dî-aws water for six mhles at 5 a.ii. JJow the scrub-woiiaîi iiiiist appn-eeiate flic l)eaitiful inud oii I lie floor she scrubfs by lannplighit. Suceli efVccts of iight and siîade. And so on. 'l'le tact is tbat no person, living. well and( sane is wifhout a love of the beau- tilîil. But ''beautfiul\"' is iiot stand(- aui, ut is relative and comparative. So hecaiise von like fo falkc about suni- sets roitiaufîcally, (I0 flot despise youîî, îîeiglîboi' b)ecaulse( sle likes fo talk abot lier beauitifiui butter prosaieally. Uni- less voit are a Ruskin or a ia rry iandci- vou, will fail to put the ''Beautifiul'' miito uvorus; so wîiy raveabout if. Tllien, as we are engaged aft a vcry liractical job if behoves us fo pay miore attenition fo those fhiugs bclonging fo coiiiioupl ace affa irs of eoifliuoiiplacî' pecople. The sehool rooiu can neither unake nor uninake a genius; but if cati imake or- retard the nîaking of a practi- cal person. Ts flîcre or is fhîcre iiot somne plan whuereby flic èehool cati teacli onily fhings thiaf reaily inatter? The nleed for nen and wonmeîî who eau do fliings wvas neyer so greaf as if is today.",
         "PALIILIANTER ist of us are familiar withi the por- s f the children of Kiing George ,Ithat m*y hielp us to beeome ýetdin the jicture of two littie ,s and priixcess wlho Uived niearly ý hundred y'ears ago, anid In the fa- 3 artist who painted it. We refer ie splendid pîcture, of the ehidren Iiarles 1, and to Anthony Van Dyck, lyreat Flemnishi painter. ýt us imagine that we are standing re the original painting in the il Gallerv at Dresdeil, where -we Standin1g at the riglt of the ieture, gownied in white wvith a miniature court train of blue velvet, and withi some red roýses iii lier hair. *Between his brother mnd sister we find the yoiuigest, Jam~es, whio was boru on October 15, 1633, and became the Duke of York, and after- wards James IL. of England. James is clad in a dress of soft rose color -with a white overdress which permnits only the siceves of the midergarxnent to be seen. le wears the little wLite cap that is sao familiar in another portrait of him, conm-",
         "TII E WESTEUN SCHOOL JOUjRNALj a pa iliter or î.oyalty1,. Noule kwbetter thanl lie ltow Io portraty the refiielint of fa ce, figure, a11d I îss tb et seellned tOchr tie t he FI emish, Frenlch, Spanishi, and Eniglishi iobility whIose poritraits lie l)aiflted. Van D)yck was bori in Antwep i 1599, and studicd uncler Riubeus, wh-Io xvas the greatest Fleinish artist of bis time. The young Van D)yck so011 I)id fair 10 rival bis great lmasteýr, andi In 1621 lic set ont for ltalY to stîîdy the beautiful Paimtiimgs of that counrtry. Ile travelle(l foui- years, mid wheul lie re- turneci t Atitwerp1 iii 1625 hie lcft lie- Imuîd hiai mlore taum a Iimundred pictures to iiriiiiortalize I is ntaie, a 11h ugli lus mnost, important works werc pa înted just after bis return to liis native land. [le the i macle several trips týo Lonîdon, and flnal]y was appointed painter to the court of Charles I., for which lie re- ceived tlîe honor of kniglthood and two lundred pounds a year. lie workcd in England seven years, and there are said to be over three lundred and fifty of his pictures ini the private galleries of Britain, besides the masterpieces lu the, National Gallery. I-l painted I hirty-eighit portraits of ( Iaru . anîd thirtY-fiveý Of Qucen Hletrietta ajonc. Van Dyck lived in a j)rilieelv esab isl ment at Bilackçfriirs, aud fourlid life at the Englisli court quite inIibarniony with bis tastcs and talents. Like miaii of the 01(1 Mast ers lic jtaitcd a inarvel- ous nuniber of pictures duriug lis short lu e of forty-two years. lie died in London in 1641. anti was buricd in St. Paul 's ('athiedrai. lus monument may be found near bo thîe grave of Trnr the faniousý Englisli artist. But thc grcatest inonuments t his naine are the hundreds, of beaubtifui pietures roi rulers, prIinces, statesiimeni, andi the Iovcly woîau*u and. ehîilre of King Charles' court, that arc to be fond iu evcry great art galiery iii the world. In the refinemient of thc faces, the no- biliby of the carrnage, tle shinmcning of the exquisitely eolored satins, the dainty fineness of the laces, tle softness of the velvets, the gleami of the })eanls and golden chains, wich arc seen inIiis portraits of royalty, as wvel1 as in the sinenity of lis religions subjects, wve learn to know and admnire the finished art of The Cavalier Painter. A Little Bit of England Tlere's a litIle bit of Eng]and in my keeping, do you kmow'- A little bit bo toi] foi-, and to love, corne weal or woe; There's a leaf of England's story handed down through ages ldîd, And a bit of Englaird's glory that 1'd give\u0026y life bo guard. There 's a littie bit of Englaud ini my kccping, do you kiiowý Wrapped about ivith wondrous legend of thc limes of long ago, Wlien the cloud of battie darkened 'gainst the flag that flics today. And the kniglits to war-itotcs ltear.keled 111iassing sfllenid( for- Ihe fray. There 's a littie bit of England ut ny kcepumg, do you ko A littie bit of lonmcland that God gives us here below; There 's a littie bit of Eriglouti 'gainst the witle wvorl(l tliat weM 'dlold Till il kucîv that mnic of Lmtglandt bave the Itearîs of kîtigîts of 01(1. -Promt litu 'î Ieel a aete.",
         "Elin rO[Z'ý' CHAT The Children's Page The New Year T1e, New Ya Xci oiilC5 in the miidiiight hiour Whcni the beautiful worl(l is stili, .Aîd the inoorilighit fals in a silver stream Over ineadow anîd wood and lîill. We eannot hear the tread of his feet, F-'or so silently eoinc lie; Biit the ringing 1)ells the good news tell As they sound ovei- lanid and sea. Where ci' lie steps, lieu joys iipspring, And hopes tlîat were lost, or dlini, Grow sweet and stroîîg iii the goldeni houirs, rflat lie evervwlere bears with liiii. Tic brings us snow fron the fieecy clouds; lie sends us the springtimne showers; lie gladdens our world with the liglît of love And Mis its ]ap witli fiowers. Sonie day, a-, softly as lie came, H1e will pass throtigh the open door, Anîd we who sing at his eom-ing now Wil neyer sec hini more. -Zetterberg. EDITOR'S CHlAT A ipp)y Newv Year to you ail, Boys and Girls, Old Friends and New, and( ]et us hope that inany of you who arc now niew friends will be old ones by next New Year's. Here we have turned over a new page again. The old one with ail its blots and scratches, ail its seribbles and its fine writing is turned back and done, ani aeross, it ail Father Time lias writ- ten \"Finis,'' and here is our fair iiew page with nothing on it but ''Janiuary, 1916.'' What are w-e going to write o1n this dlean, white page? Are we go- inlg týo ijiake il neat and tidy, are we going to dot our i 's and cross our t 's andi keep Our manrgis elear and straiglit? Are we going to malie tiiis year a record of a ha pylife lived un- selfishly? of kind tiiyngs donc for- others; of tînkliff thiligs l(.ft tiidone ? Are we goiing to avoid the blots, of temî- per, îneanness, untrutlî and lazinecss, that perhaps disfigured the page of 1915? Let us try, everyone, and if bN- aeeident a blot isý made let us make the best we eau qf it. If it is possible lct us dlean it Up by saying we are sorry and working hard to show that wve are, and if at the end of the year our 1916 page is better than our 1915 page oui- trouble wýill have been well worth while. We hope your Christmas waý a verv- happy one, and that Santa Claus was more than.kind to you and filled your stoeking to the top. Wlîat did you find in the toc? Was there a littie I)areel, or an orange, or a bag of eandy? We always were iii sueh a lîurry to get to the pareel iii the toc that we huirried througli ail the others and had to go baekc over themn again. Are you cii(ý,",
         "TH[iE %' ES'iEiN SCHOOL -JOURNAL ilig that iien' sIigli yolu g-t, ol' those fine, skates? *Aiýe vol, gettilig rosy Ceels u ild e h ' a-f ý1peI ite silowball- il],,) aid Si idi ng (olt (1005 w here filce suia onuie 1 the hlenped-up, lieaiitiful sulon tliat is flic omiw' (if ill other comifries? \\VIiat wold oi Christmnas lie witiîout sulow? 1 vould tue( evergiecals look; so gyreeni, or' the hioIIr so red with ainv other setting? Evcn the( beauties of Califor- nia pale beside tlie beauty of Mlanitoba fields and foresis ]i fthc winfer. Play oufside w'lîeîeeo'eî' voncati and feil the 1)100( leap) tiii von as y oi ruai and play and ecnjoy il ail, s0 when vou aire 01(1er and bave to Spend long houî'S atf a \u003clesk or iii a store(, you can look back ou ail those beautiful wintcr days of sin, and sllon. Cnt thic wood and carry* the w'atci, feed the cows and chiekens. anid run errands with joy in your hcart and a whistle on your lips, and even if you I)avcn't mueli time for play you will bave just as nîuch fun and wvill get just as iiuieli fresh lovely air as if you were aui idie boy or girl. Once again, Happy New Ycar f0 you, one and al! PIZE STORY Were you all foo busy w'ith Christ- mias to write 11s ;11.) ,tories? Weli, we maust jusf forgive vou, that 's al!, and aisk you fo write on another subjecf this înonfh, and itIs a great big one, foo, 'What arc flic Canadins doing fo hc]p the Rcturned Modes'Tell us ail Yo11 kîiowl of this greaf, big sub.ject, and fell us wvhat you fhink thcy should do, for our brave soldiers who have lieeiî disabled fighting for their eoujni ry. Wc are publisbing a 5f ory this meek wriften a couple of monthls ago ont \"'The Prairie Chieken.'' The Prairie Chieken If was diînîning twilight-just fthe timie at d1nsk- W'leî ail] is silent as though to take )eatl ater flic busy (lay. As 1 cntercd by the footpaflî inito flic sliadowv ' v oods, a sqîuirrel sprang lightly froua trce to tree, seoliling in- dignanfly, as tiiongli to waru ai] ithe S'hy wood'foik fliat a straliger xvas, iii- truding, and f0 l)c '1cautions, eau- tious ! ''le w'arne(l in lus shîrili littie voice. An owl glarcd dowui ouft of aui old onk af lue, anud iiiquii'd 4Wlio are yon? Who ? Whio I Ail oîiole tri]]- cd anxiouslv iii tHe distancee, aiîd n'as aniswcred rcni S]riiuglv 1) y its iluite. 'Wnnderilig îlow'ii a ýu'il)udiuîg paial. a sheet of gliiiiiicrilîg watc- uiifoidcd lie- fore me, sllowinig liffle silver rippies w'licme it cauglif flie beami of filec risiîug erescent. A fw'ig snlapped, and flic dark formn of a wvolf drop1icd fron flic water's edge, fading into fice dusk.: A kildeer's weird cry floafed across flic wafcr, and a prairie chicken's \"'Hm! Hnu! I-Im!'' came from flic dis- tancee, and leaning against a faîl pine f liegan to wonder lion' is if thiat i] these wild creafures and birds are be- ing hunfed f0 death? The prairie bird called again, then gave a sfartIed crv ind wbnrr, oruly to liglif nearer nue, seernilig but al shadow among shadows. Oh. tiiere is full need of its ciunning, For a l,'e re not etacîn es oni every sidi', wiiiig f0 caf flic eggs, destroy flhc N-oiilug, aîîd, too, flic criîci shof tha i lîrîuigs il down1 oluf of ftic cool air. lcav- iiîg if a i nîvei îig lieaip of disîtevel led golîleîi aîlid whlite aîld browin. If is h \u003c'a Ilbi-en lii îg losve flie iioisy pi casire- sec kers 1\u003clnk iio thile callii a nd quiet oif n'ood aîuii pi ahi, u'eýtii'iniig wifli flic C' ileadî'î w'ili hiî featflered spoil, lia i iig fi îîo i. fî'igil aw 111disou'dei' be- h1i iid. \\Vlat eaîu lie expeci cd bîîf tiint S 1w i la'i xvil I le gonc I Lai e iii .Jiîie, c'a-i'î'i'îî1 ic îîdelî hi' niai b flic teiiail' i'olige of slîrub, hi b'le secl to fthe keeîi observer flie pi-aule bidislesf, wviti ifis thirfeen or fointeeî vii whte-lurow'i speekled eggs. ]E'vcî'ythiiuîg se us fo go n wili tfhcîi exept for nul fecasionlal lnlc;n n ulw' is if f liaqi itior'î often thie",
         "wH-o's WHO eriItiiy Liddeil îîst is not nosed out hîy sottie of tlic four-footed folk? I iiagine if mîiist be, as in the case of the duck, that the sitting bird loses hier secnt. It does not scem long unfil the proud inother brings, lier littie famiiy forth, and then new troubles and worrics, or couid wec euh them pleasures, begin. She feaches fhem ail lier craft, and so thoroîîghly that even the sly fox or Culnni]ig w'cascl. is foiled whcn she gives the alarînled Cali. They are mislcd and quliekly follow lier, for she suddcnly has a brokewn wiîîg auJd is flopping helpless- ly but when she lias drawui tiien fron flic litti c oiîes, gîves a 'l i iccl nol ilg cail andi skîins away, cir-cling luiek f0 hier cllicl-s If vou sliouid baive s e(l I)v iiot a onie woll( you- have scOen. foir fiiy we re aili biîd(en in ftic lie wildcî'ing gra sses anîd 1 eaveýý. o r wi i ('i they seeined a part. -Ail this tlîev.\\ gwadîiliv1 lea iii-- xvhere ftic bcst oat staeks avie fomiîd. xvhieh pools are deepest, wlio are friends and -who focs, what buds in winter are sxveetcst, and how to mnake a safe, xvaria hiding place amongst the snow. But soon our wintcr bleakness w iII not be broken by its one large bird, Iiie prairie chicken, and soon if will iio longer dot our winfer sky or the whîite monotony with the criss-crosses of ils snowshoes. And lcaning agamnst the trunk of the fali pine, xvitlx a heart full of wondei' af the beauty and provisionIs miade foir thc protction of thc, wiid things, I iookcl I o Iie cali sail iing ioon and xviti a sîglh turncd to i lic niow dai'kcîî- e'd pa tlway, Ille soft nli uriinrings fal 1 - ing fanitly ariotind me, tlhc sweecc per' fîule or tii c ar-iv flo-wers abli t iii c, and 1 xvalkcd hone w'ith (]ecpI ilhotiglt iii l](1ii Fi~sî.Ii-ailii Sciilooi S( ) ETEIING TO P~LAY GEORGE E. JOHNSON Soiae Good Indoor Stuuits As the cvcnings grow longer, inucli fun may be hll iii tryiug sotuic of flic iaiany liftlc tî'îcki gaines that have ainused ehlici 'c andJ growui-uips foi' many gencrafioiîs. Soiîi of fhiesc vou nîay know ali'ca(y, lint there is fini iu frýying theni again, and alinost always fliere will lie one or' more in a group fo whom the gaines are new. Onie of flic îîîost plizzlîng of fliese grames'15 Ilit of felliiig. xvho i'aised a band behind your back. Ask fliree or four of yoiir piaymnates f0 stand in a row facing you and hold up their hands, elbows at sides, fingers up, and palms towards 'their faces. Now ask ail to put their hands down by their sides. 'Ihcni fîîuï vaut' bacli io iheîîi and ask one to l'aise one hand anJ hold if up. Meanuiiiic Vonl appîcar to lic buisic( about soiiiîfli'ig mîitil a minute or more lias piasse,(]. Tlieut you fel li he oe whosc lia uid is 'a isi'd fo lowcr if like the others. -Now -on tuî'n, fo-%'ar's fhcmi anJ tell ihemî f0 l'aise fliu liaiids as iii the firsi pîlace, ciliowý af sides, fingers iip, and baek of liîads fowi'ds you. xroii will lie aIble re-adîiv 4o p)ick ouf flic baud that was ra îsed behîiid voiur backr for il xviii be palIci thian flic ofliers. The rea- son is iht liit-ile fthc blood gafhcrcdl in flic haîids that xvere helJ doxvu, if flow- cd ouf of flic hana that was raised and leff if wlîifer than tlic others. This is quit e a puzzling gamte to those wlio (I0 îîot tliink of their physiology lessons. WHIIOS WHO ? An amusiîîg f îiek gamte may be play- cd fo puzzle one of number who is nof f amiliar xvifh if. TIiR garne may be cahiedj 'Who's Who?\"' The one who does flot kiîow the gante leaves flic roui. The rest arrange themselves in a circle and agree fo describe caeh his riglif liond neiglibor. Thc one who left tlhe",
         "TPHF 'WESTERN SCHOOL .JOURNAL roon is recalled and( instructe(I f0 48k a question of eci, îîayer iii turn around the circle anti fr'oiîî flie answer guess ''WTo's Who.\"' Since ''Who's Who'' changes in th li 'nind of each player questioned, thc answers become very puzzling until the one aaking the ques- tions begins to suspect tie jolie in the ga me. There are a good many \"mind-reacj- îng'' games that are quite puzzling for a, w~hi1c. One of theni is to tell a, nuin- ber selected by the conîpany. lu this gaine the leader has a helper. The leader leaves the room. The rest arrange theinselves lu a circle and select some nuniber less than ono hundred. The ](va(r is rcalle(I. le goes froni one l\u003e1)i1 to anothet' placing bis, lia.ds on thejir temples and bidding ail to thinký liard of tlhc nunîber ehosen. Wlicn he cornes to the accoîupliee, flic accomplice makes a shiglt biting movemient of flic jaw. This movenucut can be feit by ftue biands of the leader on the temples. Slowly the accomplice ''bites'' ont the number. If the number is over ten, he ''bites'' first the number in tens place, pauses, and flien ''bites'' thc nuînber iii mâits place. Thus if the number chosen is 34, lie bites, three limes, pauses, and bites four limes. Ini this gaine flic coin- pany need flot know there is an acconu- plice. Sehool NSews Winnipeg The sclîool managemenl committee reported, reconuiendiig. 1. That the resignations of Miss m. ,. Gray, Mrs. I. A. Hoole, Miss Clara L. Giroff, Miss E. A. Irvine, Miss M. me- lKcague, Miss lleleîî Rutlcdge and Miss S. Lyone be accepted, f0 take effeet on flic dates specified iri their letters of withdrawal. 2. That ]eave of absence without sal- ary be graitted to Miss S. Gordon until Mardi 3lst, 1916, anti to Miss J. ('amer- on, Miss M. l3astiu, Miss Jessie Ellis aud Mr. A. Dickson until June 3Otli, 1916. 3. That flic application, of Mir. F. Adamns for ]cave of absence for active service be granfed. 4. That the following teachers be ap- pointed to positions on flic elementaiy staff at sehedule salary, under Agree- ment Form A: Miss, Mabel Eyres, Miss Rose Magnusson, Miss Christimia(lm, Miss Mary Winraui, Miss Mai-jorieý D)ouglas, Miss Katheriule S. .John, MUiss ~Jean H. Wilkie, Miss Adai Spearnian, Miss Jennie McCullougli, Miss Nellie H. Greorge and Miss Nellie Ti. Scarflî, ap- pointunent iii ail cases to dal e fromî t irnu o)f assiguiet to classes. Winnipeg Teacher's Retirement Fund Your trustees are pleased to lie able to report that flic flnaîicial stateinent for the year 1914, wvlicli lias beeîî duly audited and certified b v the officiaI auditors of flic Winnipeg Public Sehool Board, shows that there bas been a, ver ' satisfactory iincrease in flic surpluS funds, flic ainount to flic credit of flic fund at flic close of tîmat year bceing $54,382.27, or au icrease of $14,077.92 over flic previous year. The funds are in excellent shape, flic interest earned on invstinents beimîg more flian suffi- cieut fo aicet paynîeut on ail retirement aunuities, thus allowing flic f ul amonf comtriliuted by the feachers and by flic Winnipeg Publie clieool Board to be transferre d fo piermuaneut account for inIvestm cnt. As -iii previolis years, flic surplus funds have bccîî invested in first mort- gages on improvedj properties, flic rate of iufterest carnie( licing 8 per'cent. lInterest paymieits have been met proi1)fy, flic inferesi on very few loauîs l)eing ini arrears. Tl'le North e r Trirsts Company, wlio ni1ake ftic ilivestients, charge a coin- muission of I Puer cenît, so thaf the net eairu inigs arle 1 iwiv cent. ou irlvestlnenlt.",
         "NORTHER'IN 'PEACI{ERS' CONVENTION At tlie close of tlic present year, il is exl)ccted that th(e fumîdl will show an mi- vestment ini the ne(ighbo)rloodl of $68.- 000.00. The nunuber of teacheus contrihuting to the fund duriiîg the curuent veir and the basis on wihthev 1omrht( as follows: 199 teachers o11 a basis of $5.00 per anl- iu; 276 tahcson a basis of $1Q00 p)er aniîuiîî 110 teachîcus 0on a l)Osis of $2 0Pei- a îmnîîii. Txveiitx-siX t, cachers bave w-itlidrawu fu'om the mimd dnring the enlient, veau thrugh theiî' retirenient fuoni tlie ýpro- fsin m olme thruglu dcatli. Thirteemi teachers have withdrawn leiporauily o11 leave of absence. Vive hiîndred and fouty teachcrs con- tuihîmte at the present fimie as comnpared With five Iiindred and twenity-eigbt, at thie close of 1914. Vive annuitants receivcd the, reti ring allowance of $400 peu annmîîa, while Mis E. -A. Holiday, who, aftel, service of 25 ycaus. lias been incapacitated fou teaching amîd retiued front, furtiier ser- vice, has been granted an allowance of 1$200 peu annum under Section Thirteen of the By-laws goveuning the fund. The rate kit which the fund continuies bo grow and the promise that it gives of stili gucater beniefit ho teachers whio ]lave speuit their lives in the scliool ser- vice, is a mnalter of guatification 10 your truistees. The motta, howcver, shonld still lbe -Make Haste Slowly.'' Let the foundation bie secure. Rcspectfully sub- iiiitted, Thos. Laidlam, A. C. Cammpbell, T'eacheýs' epuesentafives on the Board of Trustees, Winnipeg Teachers ' Retire- ietFund. Northern Teachersp Convention rand School Fair The annual Teacheus' Convention wvas lîeld in Whiiîore Sehool, Dauphin, o11 Thnrsdav and Fuiday, November 4tlî and 51h. Thle convention fromu flrst to last provcd a sucecessful and instructive mie. A noti(eab)le featuire wastie larýge aýttendance, of paremnts, esh)ecially at tlie TIlîilrsdaY a jfierniool session. Tlitirsday foreilooii w-as spent in ii dg- ing the eXiliblits of tile fair anid exalnlii iiîg the contestanît, in reaiffing and sing- ing. TFhe reading and siîîgiîg wvas ex- eeptionally good, tlie inedal iii reading, EUhaîî schiools, wvas awau(le la Sadie linhieli; RuralI scliools, lEnieîle Lausoii w1iîil e the îîedal for singi ng was a w'ar ed t) 'en Stelek. li tile afternooui the convention was foinially opened by May' or Ma cdonald Nvith his address of weleomne to the i cches.The speakers for the session were Mu. B3ell, the i)uesideiit, Mr. Wat- son, (lirector of sehool gar(lening, and MrI. Neîvconibe, superinteil(eiit of e\u003clîî- cation. Mi-. Witson spoke on \"h Id(eal Rural Schiool, ' while Mr. New- ('olibe took as bis subleet 'Recent Edii- cational Puogrcss.'' Variety îvas given to the, progranmme by having selections ironi the Normal Orchestra, choruses ad( folk (lances, froin. the public sehool puplil5. Thiiisclay evening, tlie teachers weue \"At Ilome'' to theiu visitors ini Whit- more Assernbly Hall. The McMurray Orchestra was iii attendance, and in ad- ditioni to these selections anl iîiterestiiîg progranlie wvas given, followed by re- freshmients. Altogethier a veuy pleas- omit evenmîg was spent. Fridav forenooîî two sessions wcuc held, onîe Grades 1. to IV., tIme other irades V. to VIII. In ftle Juniior see- lion iiiterestiiig papeus were giveîî by Mr. 1îAalton, of (Ilenlyon., on ' Nîniber Work.'' Mu. Gutske, of Decu Park, on ''Primauv Writing'' aud Mu. Beattie, of Dauphin Plains, on ''N7ature Study.'' lu the senlior section excellent popeus were given by Miss Fraser, of Gilihert Plains, on ''Musie '' Inspector Hl(ïri- ott, of (Jladstone, on ''Hîistoi-y,' and Mu. Hlarding, of D)auphinî Collegiate Iii- stitute, on ''Co-operation of Our Ele- incntary and Secondary Schools.'' li both sections very pointed discussions took: place. Fridao) afternooîî Assistanit Scouit ('oinnuissioner Mcliitosli gave aul inter- esting talk on ''Boy Scout Wouk.'' This was followed hy oiu excellent palier on \"Composition\" by M i. A. W. hloopel., of Wiînnipeg.",
         "TH'IE WESTER,,jN SUIl\u003c)OI, .JOU RNA f. Tlhe roii of bîîsinî si; was flîcî ai. 101)(10(l 10, and Iliese ofFicers electe(l I l\u003cu. l'res .. Mri. Noe(omlbe, Preis., -Mri. I \"el 1; V ie Pres\u003ev'., lxiis.i B. (Jill.e ; A reai uionwas 11uaîiiolslv ca îîied thlai ea cliea clier ini the district Co ti Iute $1 /) a Uwinii tu tMe a triotie Fîî iii. It ivas (leciied to hold the convention of 19116 at {Clbert Plains. The simig ig of the natioa anthen lîroîgli th le eo iivenito a close. Box Social at Bidford School Th'le seliolars of Bidfaîd 111). No. 456 lield a very sucessfnl Box Social 0o1 the ivening of Friday, November l2th. 'Ple sumu of' $102.75 w'as vealized, $60.00 of whI Ahu was doma ted to I le ('aiadiaii Redî (ross Fund, anid th lu blance used I o 1)nremase the \" B3ook of KnoivIedge ''foir Ilhe sebool library. The Bidford seholars scnd. in a buidget of ncws of the district each wcek foi- pIieation i n th e )el ora inie TPimes. We lhavet louitii thé tu le OiF ltiitj tu tu, seliolis, aii( thte iit\\ un alqnnitiut lix Ille it51t(iiisi of tIlt di,'.tiitt. Notes 31%~ Veit Riiddel i. piiinia v teaelîuî at SîîoNvflake. bas aceeîîted a siînilar oiINti on the JitMIsseli \"lo(l staff? foi 191 6. Il. C aiiîeioî Mîîlligaîî, piliîuia1, l1wa a Cet e(l thle priîîeipals i p Of tlîe ROs.,ý- lii ii u dtdsebool. Ilerîîîaîîî G. Ilirs f. 1 C i'lif of the G~leniloi-o sellool. 'Tle stalle foir Ilit îîeseîit tern in~ tii lia tiiit Coiisoliîlat id SeIlool is -,e toli lows: P~îulie Sthlîtlleiitmeî.lls ' .U. C oclimanie. PlniiaiI Crai I., IL. Mxiss E. t owan, (irai l Ili.; Mrî. K. Mx. I Ge'iOradîes I V.. V.: Mxéis S. -Sîiroatt. \u003cJuades CVII\\'l, VIII. lEgl Helioîfl l)eîa il1 niîit xs I ('oaies, B.A., Assitm ; T. A. Neiî MtlA- l\u003eîiîeiîîal. A Nation's Strength N i l 0d. but oîîly inen can ilia 1 A people great; and strong- Mxenî, who for truth and honour's sa ke. SIani\u003c fast anîd suffer long. I h vi' u! i lie work whilc otiiers sleep, Whlo dare xw'len others fly- 'l'ley l)iil\u003cI a nation s pillans deep, -And lifi tlieîn tu tlie sky. Land of My Fathers Lan oîl f nm fathers! xheresoe r 1. roamî, Lanid of mny birth! to nie thon stili art home. Pence an(1 prospcrity 0o1 thy sons attenîd l)owmî tu postcrity thîeii influence deseeiid. 'Phough other celîcs ina brigliter fiopes fiilfil. Lanîd of niy birth! 1 ever love thce stili! %laven shield our happy lionie f'oi ea ch liosti le banîîd, Freedmu and plenty ever erovvn oui- liaiivi landi.i. -Welsli Naionîal Anîthllim",
         "OBITUARY 24 bituary thls she tauglit for nine years ini a Glas- Ak of gow Board school. muI at In 1887 she and her sister joiued their, ridaiý parents, mho had emigrated to Canada eased a few years previously and settled near Oraugeville, Ont. In 1889 she accepted an invitation te",
         "THE WVESTERN ýCH00L JOURNAL and father anld one brother, resid- n Ontario, and one sistr mon ves rand Fok.Minn. te bereaved relatives have the Éfe1t SYMPathy of a host of friends toir bereavemnent. .e Sehool Býoard is ennsidering the 'lis\"hment Of Soule Rintoul Nlemorial ini 1876. She canet to Mlaitoba i the \"boomn days,\" a djauigilter of th, planse, 0on a 1 y mission fle]ld. 'l'lroughout -G. W. B3. Bartlett",
         "deals w~ili h )1 aetieial issues, showîlig w'hat has lbeeî donc1 iîî tbe playgroîîîîd iioveincit, and ini the modification oïl pinys at seliool, aîîd ends witli a de- scription. of the îu'ost j)oputlti ami in- ýt riiefive gaines 10w' in ii)se iii tbe play- groiinds of Aierica. Arîy one ilaving Ihese two books wouldj le in a firi w',a\\ to direct suceessfully the play of ellii- di-en, and1, as, Mr. Lee says, pi1)av is the e iati r e n . ( i V l t O i i a t v t o f l jtt le R. L. Stevenson 'Iehre lias Juisi appeared a littie booki (ini fli fe of R. L~. Stevenison, by Aiin Plus, iblished by Geo. Jlarrap \u0026 Co., L ondion. i t ji tIlle kind. of boo0k tliat -d I fiierîîs oflI ile elii(l i'euî shoiil bave. Evcry feiecacer îîowadays, de- liglits iii teaciiing Steveiisoîî 's stories, and1( verses, and natinrally tiiere ils al desi re oii tihe pîart of flie clildrei 1o, kîîlow' somnetilinig about flic mîail whiose bookis t liey kîïow. Tilis I itfle voliiiii w'ould eost about t llirtv or fo'tv Cent-,. Queen Victoria Fi'oîa Ille sainae plibl isilei' comles aia l'ipially iiifei'estiiig hittie book 011 flic life of Qucen \\iri~~.~ Now ils flie fiime w'hen flic great Q en' lite should bc studied aîîd piî riofisîn iîîsfil ed. Tliere, 15 no0 siiiall bolok o11 tIis siibject fliat is betteî' tlian this onie, wbîech is edited liv Gordon Brownî. Selected F0R\\S' 0F WATER The firsf qluestion ils: \"Where does the w'ater conic froîn. iliat falîs w-hel if raîns? 1 Iwant you. f0 thiîk, and 110f reply liapha7ard. We are f0 be lioole' thîis inornhing ; fliey are iii no hiuîry an1d( îiever speak iUiitil tliey have conic f\u003c) a Foris of Sîiomw ('tiystais, 2. ''The wvafer riscs from flic occan anîd lakes andl inakes elouis ; flien il coines downl iii ran.\" 'T rlat a iîswer * ecis to suif rnost of you. Well, Mary ? v 83. '' w iant f0 know Lowx if is tlîat file wafei riscs. Wliaf iuakes if r-isc?'' A good question. M)es the water risc? Wh-o lias seenl if risc? Wliat proof is Ihere thaf it rises? 4. 'Wl.y flic'poii(I on Mr. Bî'adfoi's failui, is ail dry; tiiere iîsed f0 lie a foot of wafer in flia ?'' Whlo cisc lias a 1)rOof? 5. ''l put soille w-ater iln al 111(i1~i inail 1ho1u if w-as ail gole.'' 6. \"'If vou put soiîîe in . yourIl' iîad it w'iil Vi pola )1te iii al few inîuîtes. .7. ' Wateý put inil kettie 011 a stove Ait fliese are îiroots of soîncfhing. 0f w-liaf, John? 8. ''Tafwaitcr goes iltfo vapor.' l)oes iiat secîîi t) li' the tlîiîg. yoil seeni sat îsfied. IIow- niiay have secîî mafer go iuifo vuipor? -H[om- îaany be- lieve flia t thle water in Mr. Bra dford's 1)0nd( w-cut iauto valuor? IJow uîiaîîv think flic w-ater of tlic oceani goes unito, va por I But that ils ail for toda.y. 1'o-norrow youi w-ill hiave miore f0 say abut water. IL. 9. Now Lice is tlue question fî'oî flic box: 'What piîts flic wa-aci iiito Vapou' anîd keetis if iii vap)or? ' William? 10. ''1 thiîîk if is beaf.' Wliy? Il. ' Iecaiise flic teaketi le boils w-ifl lieat and. uiakes steanii; voit have fo, apply lieaf fo niîake w-ateu' go iîîto vai- wlcu' does the lîcat coule fî'oli ? 12. \" Froîin flic in. Now w-c have got fr'ont the wvater f0 tiie sun Tle siiîî lis al good deal t f0 w-uthll He rf. FOI,ý1,4 OF WATER",
         "TrHE WVESTERN S«'ROO. .JOURNAL 13. \"'The Sun keeps the xvater as va- por in the air.\" IIow do you know? Give us proof? 14. \"If you have a pitcher of cold wa- ter it 'sweats.' My father says it is the vapor in the air that mnakes the sweat. ' It is the air that sweats and not the piteluer? lb that it? Cive more ex- amples that showv the air has xvater iii 't. Who have seetn dcxv? Why does it fail? Tell us sonue uses conuiig froin the holding of vapor by the air. Thie question today is: ''What turns the vapor into raiîî?\" 16, ''The -apor beeomnes cloîîds and the clouds cannot hold ail the water and 17. \"J1 have seen a eloud disappear.\" What caused it? 18. \"My father says a warm. current of air does that.\" 19. ý'A eold current makes the vapor l)econe a cloud.\" 20. \"Rain is caused by a cold current of air rushing into a warm eloud.\" Could we make an experiment like that? 21. \"On washing days if a cold cui'- rent of air cornes in1 at the window it xviii makze a sort of fog in the room.\" IV. There are fifteen questions left in the box. I wi]1 let you copy them: i1. How is it we see our breath? 2. Do clothes dry faster on a wind(iv or stili day? 3. Where is the dew before it falls,, say at noon? 4. What is meant by \"'the sun draw- ing water?'' 5. Why should xve nex er sit uti a dIraught when heated? 6. In xvhat direction xviii a eloiff I ravel? 7. How fast wiIl a cloud move? 8. llow cau clouds be rnoving îi two directions at the saine turne? 9. Why do we sec most elouds iii the evening? 1.0. Are ail rain drops of the sanie Size ? Il. Why does it rain harder after a lîeavv elap of thunder? 12. What are the sigiis of rainy and fair xvcather? 13. Where is t he ,un on a eloudy day? 14. IIow high are tHe clouds? 15. Why is ramn water freslh wIîei it eoilles fioni1 the ocea1 ? X O1JR SON'S EDUCATION liv R'FI'E1). DEFAN Righit at the start let us understaud onie aAother. We are discussing vour hoy \\ ediica t iot atid iiot iiis sehooliig. Wesay that we are goinig to gîve our boy thle best e\u003ciueatioii that the worifi eati provide ai\u003c ilh\u003cil i lie vextIO'ii",
         "YOUR S~ONS E1T(AT1ON we istatc that lie is to go through tiie higli sehool and on to college. We meant to say that wcc arc. going to send him to the Lest sehools. Let ii- sec, if there is a difference. The ordinary public sebool couirses leading to college cxtcnd over twelve years and have,* on an average, 190 days a year of five biours a day, hl the average college course lias twcntv- five recitations per -%eek for thirty-six weeks for four years a total sehooliug of 1,5,000 hours. There arc lcft, tliere- fore, outside of selhool 177,720 hours. This is where you anîd the rcst of the educative process bave a word to say. Perhaps thc street, tile playgrounid, picture show, the dlinrclh. do thieir part in giving him an education. Perhaps you bave ncevcr thouiglt of it tliis wvay, and in your innocence you have had the impression that you paid taxes to have your son cdui- catcd-tliat while lie was waving tlie green and pink college flag lie wvas get- ting educated. M1eanwhule your univer- sity may have been a farin with thc college colors of black and bine. You mniglit as wcIl sec first as last that cdu- cation and seliooling are two different things and that every hour ont of the twenty-four is a step forward in bis educative process, wliether it be wvith- in his bedroom or the four brick wralls of the sehoolbouse or whetlier it be at the table or desk, with lis ciores or with lis books. Let us start with the boy of fourtecu. This is an intcresting and important age; later on wc eau work forward and liaekward. Obviously you don 't ex- peet a clierub, a littie old man, or a sneak. You expeet just plain, unadul- tcratcd boy. You want him to stand -%ell on lis feet , look you in the cye, tell you the truth. Not that hie Is ai- ways to tell the truth, that miglit be uninatural; but whlen you say to bim, \"John, honest now, John, is that straiglit goods? \" yon expeet linm to sa. \"Yces, dad.\" You have been on the square and it lits rather liard if lie (10es not rcspond. You wvant hiiî to sleep wbeni lie slcci-s, work w10he lic oîks, l)laY wi bie platvs. S'ou likce an active boy-ane that rutshies iiîto flic ganle vit1ï his wholc soi-l. 0f course hie is a bit bois- terolis at tiimes anîd verV imipulsive, but inst the saine von aire prond of hua.ii and a smile of satisfaction consover your face even if le iiiterrlljts an, afternoon cahier as le races back to the celar ho mnake that Nwater wbeel or to tlic ficld to play bail or iato the yard to gather thie fruit. llut remiember 1bat tberc are but feiv parents -\\blo eau give liberty anid relize ilbat h heir chul- dren arc ouly loalicd to thein. It is taken for granIed thiat lie smviuus like a duck, runs like a deer, and secs everything as an cagle. Ie will have more use for swimming than for piartial paymcnts; lie will draw upon his. phy- sical prowcss more times tlîan le wvil l'se cube root. lie wvilI need to avail himself more of his powers of observa- tion gained thronghi purposeful. organie education than his knowledge of the location of Kaynchatki. Ie lias devel- opcd his sensory organs. The summer tan, imitative of the Indian color, is more than skin deep, for beneath we flnd a sturdy boy, a deep eliest, a strong heart, firm welI-knit muscles. You offer no apologies for his appearanee. You do not have to say, ''WelI, you know his grandfather wvas always a sick]y mnan,'' or that lie ''reseinbies his unele who hiad consumption whicli lias always been on one side of our family.'' You hope that lie likes a dog, deliglits in woods and fields and believes in coin- rades. A normail dog and a normal boy always get along together. Wbo ever heard of a boy likîng cats except wlien lie liad the mumps? Your boy of four- teen is only semi-eivilized. H1e likes to, build camps, sleep ont of doors, fisli and bunt. Hie is too old to play in- dian, lie is ready to be Indian. Hie is past the stage of mock battles, of wearing bueliskïn and feathers. Ife lias taken up the serions duties of borne- building and providing-tbat 's -%hy lie likes camping. You may not know it, but lie bas been repeating in lis short life the bistory of the developimcnt of",
         "T'li WESTERN S( '1001, .JOURINAL1 file limnitait riic anîd lus iterest ini na tunre lias race shgiuffea nee. L e t lis 111)1' t lit lie admxires uval nulehu, stands 1)v lus hleroes an la ooks up1 to bis illother. Yesterday it w-as Tlucodore Roosevel t whlîo he a\u003cluii e\u003c ; to(lav it is Eiiest l'hmpsii-etoî;toiorr-ow lt xviii be Wright in his aeroplane. le is a, change- a ble lad, but the mien who do things are the olies who appeal to lina-. Ljatelr lie ivill be (bing things Iiîinselt. Yon expect tliat lie stands iip for tiiese tel- lows, for, after ail, a friend is but thie lengthiened shadon' of mie's owni self. Most streunously lie wili defeuîd these Ipeopie and you uniay be a bit piqued i)y bis loyalty, lut you mnay -weil suniile and be content, for exuberance tbocsuî't laist any too long iii the worId, and a iioy cati be onfly onîce a cluild of nature. Somehowv we ail xvant lirn to like his inother andi look up to lier. 1 know lie does, for long ago wlheîî lie xvas iii -lîort trousers site had bis confidence. Of course your boy plays fair. le wilI play fair at the gaine on the ficld anyhp' w. Cati lie not be encouraged to play just as fair at sehool and in the honte? Oftentiînes a boy lias a better sense of justice than inany of bis eiders. Ilis conscience is more reliable. 1 once kîîew a boy who was discredited in Srnday School because lie said that conseience was the best guide to riglît living. Well,, ït ivas a boy's anlsxer, and he spoke front a boy's viewpoint. The fact wds, the boy had at that tirne a conscience. For mnyscîf, i had rather stand up before the Court of Appeals with a sharp lawyer to defend me, than to have my case tried before the con- science of a fourteen-year-old boy. Wlîo ever heard of a boy xvho was ealled upon to ''peacli' ont another boy ex- pecting immuuîity frout punish nieîit? The boy takes bis eite of law-inaking front the Iiidlian, not front bis state code of laws. Jt's to be iuopcd that thue boy lias a father as well as a inother, a few bro- thers anti sisters, a mois~e t cacher, or two. lis father inust reicuiber tiuat lue wvas oncie a lboy. Youl knowa 'ît hav sieisioi t iieiiioiies. Anyoîie w-,oiilId tlin k Iixwvre lîorîiayia ed. 1 hope tfia t b is iliothleu teilipers lier abI lidiuig love îvitl jus~tice. i hlave ta iugit selioni eîoîuglî to( kimow thiat iiohiesare ve ry 1)1 md t o tlîe faul ts of t heu boys; ofi eu a giril is at fault, lut a boOee.(ne fatiier of ni \\ a c ja nt tcealIwa« vs gave h is boy a iiekîng at homne for evCi'v one reee'ived at sli ool. Anothei aIway,,s blustered ablouut wliat lie woiilul do\u003c to thie teachier f'or plinîsliuig ]ls hoy. 'l'le first box- iiow ta kes Ibis jiedicine in tue miarket- laice Ilke a tuait. The second is al iaoiiycoddie ex'en at forty. The boy ouglît to have a few brotiiers and sisters. Tluey xvill teach hin to give and ta ke, and it 's a good lessouî to learn Young. f trust that bis hontie is sonietliuig more titan the panti'y and a bcd. It should be more than a cook-y jar or a place to stay wheui everythin g else is siîut up. Mav ]lis sclîool be more titanî a reei- tatioiî period. .it shouid he the place in wchto leni things, niot a place îuîerely to recite thein. Gfrant that bis teacher secs usouuutiing beYond percent- eage litîarks on a report caîîl. To infinite patience may the uuîaster add a, little wisdonî (lituted witu tlieiiuilkz of liiait kinduuess and scasoned -with the sait oi' coininon sense. May lie believe in Iii'; work andi look beyond the pay roi]. May lie have as mnany iiiol(1s as bhw la. boys iii bis classq and not atteînpt to jaîn all of titis humait cmvy into thu' saine form. We have beeii thinkinig of whlat you wxanted and xvhat I expeet, but 1 rather suspect that Ilie boy expeets a feu'. Iliiigs hinuscîf. Ile expeets that, bis parents are stiirdY, responsible and I!an f he were a inere (log, we would examaine bis p)edigree auîd value luitu aceordingiv. If lie were a cow, ,we woîîld put hu'iti down as a scrub, or beef, or dairy type, auîd pierce bis car -%it], a regîs-,tere(d tag. If? lie were the sed of a weed, we would not expeet huuni to grow into a rose. llow can wxe expeci sometluiîg of this boy wlien per- Lausie lia ve notluing ivitu uvhich t o",
         "YIIVI SON s ED)lCATION st f î' ? 1iits i haIt ail pitshlîold l okll i n t11w u iiirol' a inuite l\u003eefoie tlwy î\u003eas.\u003e *jîîtlgutl o1 their owlî boy. We IiUleluise eows' aiens 1\u003e15oit theju' pedi- ( 'te, blit wheii it COiliit' to boy's, we( li e a ni i dea tha t soiute speejial dis1 n îî N5ltiou wilIl lie gri'iniet and( t ha t n eh h ru' blondt noi' lînine eiivironniieuii t'oîiiit. l'lit lhis is gaîus nature. )UP )' V e'xl)ets, fresbl air to 1w i1s isleeop, at piIax and in sehlool. [le t]e ri5ot iu ;l't' I uvtelt 1prot(etor a 101und luis wiîlnu ws, rir lie is biiilding ni) a p)a vni of il uîgs I llat wvilI itot reîîuile in bis latter v(la ,Vs sojouru in A shevili e or C'oorado 1vn. Ie rO et t9 be ted als sa nielv as lînse, 'ns iîl nus. we(I o iiot want the\u003e anîlliili On OUI uioIr odei tarins to gel 11101'\u003e' atteul li thonl the boys. Yon eau wî'ît t to the I)epa î'-tuuîenit of Agri- et'IltPe It Washingtonî for a bulletin on a 1)alafleed ration foi' a liog. Aimlal teýediîng is a popular sub.jeet for dis- euIîsioII. Oui' boy is Worthli t ieast as unucih asý ;I log. I contfesýs tliot w-e aref adx-auîciîug, for onl1y the otlîer day J sa-W a \u003etai e fair annorinceîîîeut of a lwize of $5(0 foir the best baby, w-hue offly $23 was offered for the best pig. O1ui. greatest lesour-ce' is oui' boys and girl]s; andt soiiie day yon a011(1 I will sec it. 'Plie bo)y asks thiat bis ual mail iii- stin]cis for' activitv be turiîed troîn deviltrv inito luseful. knowledge, produc- tive labor, w'holesome pîlay'. The best Pe(lagOgieai query is that askcd bya i)Oy: ''Teachler, wvhat is this for?'' He înust be given an answer within his eînprehension, one that contains an elu'îuent of fraîîkinss and titat will di- gest better thon the stereotype(I, ''l t is iii tlîe course of study.'' Our boy likes to do things -%hich seeni worth whlîe. Asic Mm to dig boles, plant trees, eai'e for thcm, pick the fruit and seli ii the( opeil mnarket foir bis own profit, lie is with you. Asic hini to dig holes and theuî Bul thein up, be is a gaiiust yolt; lie expeets to sec his work ,.aînouînt to sonietlifg. Ili play lie ex- pects Il chiance to play wholesoic gailnes. Thîis lie cannot d10 ïn a two- 1by-foîui itaok alie*v, or' ili asx-'lte fl at. I spoke of lus (ltvilti'v. It is 11t)t ;l pretty woi't, but i use il advisediy' , t or' the devil always finds worlc for idie bîands. Yonj b'ioy- ot fiii-teen ougl tn ia vt' a set ni' tool s or' a gitii;beltr liave both. le will fin( a vent tori' ls îîeîîit-uip activity in nlaking anti grow- îîîg tings. Ile canni-ot iilways o'li t lî'ar'iig abouit things. le expects that lus capaeity, uîtei'est anid native abiiîy wvill be studied anid wist'iy dîî'ected. le is differ'(nt froin otheî' boys; Ilie bas ta§tes aid, cal)aci- tie'of bis own. If Predcrick Reîniîg- ton hadl beeîî tied to the clerk's stool. w'e should nleyer have hiad those caiivasý pictures of Western lite. If Thomnas, the eider brother ot Joseph, Wedge- wood, had liat his way. the yoiuîîgeî' son wonldl have inade bt'own ,jugs b *v the thousands at the old pottcr's wheel instead of bine plates covered wvitiî vines and r'oses. Parents buyftheir boys tickets to one place, but fate puts theuuî off at another station. The father of Stevensoniî ntoiîded that Robert Louis sliauid be a designer' of lighthouses, but i atheinaties ivas shelved for Dumas aînd Scott. Cobden started luis boy out to be a business mail of the old sehool, but the son cuded as ail educator, agita- tor against chili labor and creator of inodel conininnities. But beyond what you expect of your boy, or what he expeets of you, tliere is that which lue expeets of us-you and me, everybody. lIe is, literaiiy our boy. 11e is not yoîîrs alone. Neitlîer does he belong to himiself alone. lie beiongs to hunîîaîî socicty, anti is to go iinto ihe juuakiîug of our hiumauî ivealtu. Perbaps lie is to be our Thomas Edison, our Michael Angelo, our Abrahamî Linîcoln, oîîr first citizen and allways our gî'eat, good man. Now he cannot be grent, îior good, nom' Godlike alonie. Neither eliti you as a par'ent do it ail. The city ini wuvhc lives, the street on wvli lue piays, the sehool to w'hicm bc goes will (Io its shau'e in making Iiiua an edueaitud îianii. XNhat wsill it înake liin? Taea look iiulont you. L~ook at",
         "THE, WESTERN SCHOOL JOURNAL billboards. your chea p Suinday si ippi e- inients, Yo1U ceOr saloons, your dives -ind your five-eenl shows. They iii eonitribiîte toward giving your boy an education. They -will appeal to his eîirs aîid to his eyes. They have doior aind display and inake their appeal. to the senses. Tlîcy arouse the mnotions, -while your sehool nierely appeals to the intellect. You are appalled, possibly diseomtira- cd, by t he problem. You had an idea that your boy's education was siîaplv a question of schoolhouse, teachier, deskz and books; that yon could throw off Ilie responsibility and put it up to the schoolrnaster, and if you wcre not satis- fied you could teleýphone to the super- intendent of scliools. Schools are fine things, an-d you are prond of the olie in your town. 1 Wonder if it runs likçe a shoe factory? Very likely it has ii snip- erintendent, foreman, workmen, mach- m ies, time-clock and card indexes. It differs in but one respect from a shoe - shop, in that it works upon huma n ma- terial. The shoe faetory takes the shapes it. It uses forty-five m1achies and over oue hundred proeesses. Tt pulls the leather inito shape and it stays put. Likewise the school faetorv lias its departments. Tt thinks that it i-akes accuracy by the algebrale mua- chine, rcasoning power by flc geoiniif ry hopper, morals by the ethical pnnîpil, promptness by the tardy-iiiarkl systei a, study by report-card indexes, sticek-to- it-iveucss by the punishrnenit i)ioceýýs. expression by the gramnar triîiinîier and citizcnship by the civieslae. You and 1 scnd ouir boy as raw ia- ceriai to its doors, cxpeetiiig a finished produet donc up in a prize Iakg delivered at the shipping mont. We forget that teachers eaninot I)c mach- lies tîmat Yoilea cimot plill ail b)oys ovcr t e saine fles a,, you eaui I eatheu- ii al shoe factory; that report cards (IOi't work as Weil as factory tiniecad tbat ill boys wvîll fot p)ack as Weil aIs sboes iiito niee littie boxes, il] of! 11 i saine si7e an1(1deiuad for the ,,]ani(, Let iue saiy a wvord about sehools: Forgive nie if 1 refer often to tlîe homew aud the street. 1 cannotl help it. foi- thcy concern your boy's editmeation. Ie, goes to sehool at the âge of five; hie Jikes to go, and it is a iloxel proeed- ing. lu faet, yon caunot kccp) hini ajt home. But do not worry, later on vomi mnay have no difficulty in this direction. lus teacher gives himn a pair of seis- sors, some pieces of palper, blocks of wood and a lot of free sîmaice iii whvieh to inove. You eall all this plaini non- sense. You want him to learu the alphabet, and adcl and sit at a desk ail the mnorning. lIt is just as wcll. that vou are not a teaclier, for lie is learui- iîîg forin anîd dimiensions thirougli his papier euttiug. Hie is lcariiing numnber iorkç with his blocks, ani lic will learn to rea(l without knowiug his letters. The pictures in the book and the oh- .jects in the rooru are teaching hini. lu his gaines he is learning to follow direc- ti;ons and to get along with others. lus teaclier tells him stories illustrated with actual objects from nature. Of course you give him a mourishing breakfast before lie starts. You drcss lîim in clothing suited to the season and watdh him with loving eyes as hie goes down the street. You bathe hiîni every day, as Woods Ilutchinson says. ''extcrnaly, inlernally auJ ctcrnally.'' You take lîir upon your krnee at even- iîîg to ]isteîî to those bits ýof confidence which he is only too glad to give to those whom lie loves, and you read or tell him a story. You sec to it tlîat hie lias plenty of sleep. In short, yoti have it fixed iu yoiir mmid that thc ratio of sclîool life to educational dcvelopmcîit outside of sehool, is that of fifteen to one hundred and scventy-sevcn. You are remeînbering that 'lie seioolimîg gained at the expense of nerves aîîd digestion is of smlall avail; that yoin boy learus only iu tinies of pleasîîrablc animation, by doing. lbromgh expres- sionî, throughi niusie anl tihe mnifiold Influences of' beauty and harmony. F'ur-tlîermore, yon also will be getting lui ieat ion. Fropbel a1wziys insisted t ha t",
         "Ili(,e dueation of a child and luis iot her siîould go hiand in lianci. lie wMil asIr yoit inany questions. -Does the trolley -wheel inake the ear go?'' ''Wo inade Giod ?' ' ''here, (lacs the snomw couic frouî?' Don 't say 'shut up), for lie ay re- turn the remnark to yout xvhen lie is ten, and then you xviii wonder w'here lie lias heard it. lie is vivaciolîs, itiquisit ive and aetive. It 's a hîappy eoifditiani so (1011 't spoil it. A l)it lai er in sebool, he, )viii have ceentary nmanual training, drawing, mlusie, geograpliy and reading. Hie xviii have inarching and gaines. lus sclhool- l'oorn xvii be equipped with chair,, and tables, and not eils of dcsks. lHc reads wchl and hnows sonething of the world of nature. Hie cau uise luis hands and eycs and cars. lie lias a well (lcvelop- ed sense of toucli aud taste. li nay rcad a bit better than you. did at i, age. Hliceertainly knows more about birds and bugs. He can amnuse imiself by the htour drawing pictures whvlui illustrate the littie stories outcropping from his imagination. You sec uîow what the sehool is trying 1o do tliat it is getting at the bra;ii thirougbi the avenues of the five selîses. Thei seiio\u003el \u003clay is, longer than forîaerly, beeause one-haif of the day is given over ta boo0k work an(1 tbe otber biaif to actix' ity xvork. lHc cornes homne xvithout books aîd, is free to play and to ieilp Mou about tbc bouse; rcady to go to bcd carly in that xvll-ventilated rootît rcady iii the inorning to begin agaiti that educative proccss which mus ovet' t xenty-four periods. lie is now about twclve. H-e is sturdy, observant, healthy. lic knoxvs lthe four operatious iii arithinetie. H1e eau rcad and write, work and play. lus day is iiivided int schowoliug, working, play- iug, eating and sleeping. You arc the s.choohinaster in charge of the last four activities. Probably your boy about this time begins to change a bit. lie is absent-niinded, listlcss, even ''odd.'' H -is complexion is not quite clear. lic grows too fast, you say. Ib is easy ho explain; the period of adolescence has eatat, Il is a t ry-iig mie, andi arle vYoil going to leave iiin ta face it aline ? Tbe aid (isa ' , 'Wlîere ignorance is ltliss, 'tis ioill to be Nxvis,- ' does not appl ' fiero. -Ignorance and innocence arc niot synionvulous ternas. idpas gained fromi Ile i'ie of tl(. )oy ' vs imaginationi al)J1 xords Leard ili i ndeî'tone througli \u003c)ler boys, are no sulîstitute for know- ledgc touiglit iii ai i revererlee ami sweet-miîiîdediiess by biis aet. \\'o111r boy is reatiy oi' tIlle hligli- sU 11001; lie is strong ami d ell, cicar-eyed a ini a ecomlullisiied, fui I of lwirnise an(l Juoxet'. Il is tiîiie for maore farinai xvork iiit la nguage, math -fentia tis, science, i îstory anid -ad\u003cvanceti Eîii si 1draIng1 a id slio) xvo'k ; hie blt t 'to illustrate -ejelttifie ai inatiietualie I('lwineiples. Yolare imlpa tijent tor' iiiii ta bu Presi- de1fl-, af the Vrnited States. If hic stays iii Objo or New York, perliaps bue may fill bbc offiee. I1f hie i ta live in I)ela- warîe, thcre is pirol\u003eablly 11O Cia nce. Il is one chanee i a maîlii tiat lie xviii be aur eliief magistrat 'e. Il is a million to onie tbat lie wil I bave to waî'k for a living. Witbîn a I'ew years lthe worlh will look itaiii itbe face and ask this elcati-eut (iluiesi ion: ' Wllat eau vanu do, am aiLiox wel eau you do. it? 1'' lu a iWU 1 W \u003cI inel h is position iii ai life. It is about t une thiat you anti ,\\oi- son began Ia chart thc boy 's life course. Yoit (Io nat xvat him. bo be a unisfit, nar au under-done. Soine of the latter seek situaitions, xvitlt etphasis on tIlle \" sit,. Thiee arc various types of Itigi- seltool courses fromn which lic mnax elîoose. The sebool issue is squarcly bew lfare van. You xviii bave ho bluink or EduIlcation îîîakiîg the MUa anid Ediuca. l ion makiug tue Job-not bxvo separate iad opposing factors, but rather two eoînpilcmentary components wîieh. go into lte inaking of intelligent and use- fli citizcnsluip. The ineasure of a mani is xvbat lie does with what lic know, as wcil as knoiîîg ivhat lie does. The job of life -is geting vcry conli- piîated. Science aud teebnology arc enheriîîg mbt il. Great ,eonotuie, and YOUR -SON'S EDUCATION",
         "'l'HP % VfRSTERqN s(!Ho()l, i)RAI social (Iliestiolis ar i''coinlu lg to tii e frond. hefa rier, even wili iliprovcd mlachi iery and fertilizers, is ip agaiiust thei iiiileni. 'Ple ti-aincîl iiachinist is t nriied ont of wvo-rk by the atitoiiîatic illachle. Thle iisiiiess ilanl is, fa ccii Nv itti strolig eoiilietil ion. Yoîî iiiust niot. e Icite, sehooliiiaster, eiinfise voit. wOîexol separate, iii t lieir educatitia t lieor v, bra iii xvork bi l li i work, (li ieaiil ve toî Buit a Il ira in'ing is for- use auîd for ser- vice. Jl t nay miake for l)etter lîcalli and inereaqe\u003ci liajpiiuess, for mi-ore con- tent mlent, ror. botter' boilles, rfor filuer eýitizecnsliip ' alnd eveit for large r pay (' Il velopes. It inutsi find( ilýs expression i n a better niait amid a better Job. Don 't be con fiised lw th(, terms \"f hiured ' anul] ' ' )ruitiCil.\" ' on' lioy îniay lhinik Iliat Englisiî and history arc riseless, auîd that shop inathemnaties, ilraxvitg anid mechanies are uiseftil. le ilnay get a good job becauiso of ewi- eieney in the latter grouip, but if lie riscs iii the world of business lie xviii neei 10 know bow to write eonitractç, Io size iii) men and situations, (,voin to aippeair l)efore the congressional inves- i igat ing eonîmittees, and sbiop flguiring auîd sbop working xviii not be sufficient. A. man front his collar button clown is worth two dollars a day as iiorsel)ower. Ail lie carns in addition is based uI)of biis intelligence. This question of what line of voca-_ tion your boy is to foilow~ is mnore than interesting-'it is vital. Tiiere are uit lcast two great events iii ai boy 's lire -when he lias luis parents piekeil for lîîni, aud when he picks bis job. Per- lîaps the sciool w-ill furnish reliabie in- formation througli vocationai buireauls as o thc varions vocations open to tue boy, the cond(itions, 1revailing iii ecd and wliat flic rewards of sulccss mray he. Bostoni, New York litid lufia o et]]- ploy experts xvho make investigationis of conditionis iii tule tradles a rid dJiJrl'î'r eiut lines of buisiness of flie locaflity, auJi prepatre for the use of puipils uiîdl( par,- ents material that xvill futriislî t lie best availabie information abouit the job. To- day soute boys, and girls are lookitig l'or \"ii' vbing, ' an aut i aîîtiirig\" is a 1)larîl positiori to fitfd. 1I hope voit(I ilo it xvii t vouir Soli tIo iiax-e 11erei,(v a eleil*aîîlindei job, or I o lie presidiit o f tIlle Nemw York Central tue( iuît c le gets ont., of college. 11e xvi l arrive ait tule terminal only as lie lias alreadv travclled on the road. IL, xviii succcc( beause Il(e eau (Io tbiigs. If' ai fi s seiîool xvork ln oiiti iieunorîzing. it reeitig wliait otliers b ave don c, lie is io fouiiia tioni oni wliich to aco uiiî,for bie kniows niotbinig ýof tbe aIrt of uloilig. i trulst f liat voit arc niot goîigo t o send hinm to sehlool ini uuî'er fliat Ilic îaay get an educeatioui so tlîat ]l, ie vl not havxe to xvork for a 1 iviiig, for 1 ain afraid tis attituide loxarils life xviii start îiîn to xvards tbe serai) bcap. I)o not wallk arouind tue, bouse on tiptoc foir fear thai you xviii disturb .John 's sîdiî ani excuse hirn froat dîitx- a thie asli sifter, the Coal bill aud tbc' lawni mnloxer becauise lue is getting ait educationi. Yoni better not or\u003cier vont' boy's edît- cation by telephone as voit dIo your gro- ceries. Do more tban sueîi sgn the ,report carîl. Sec the lacc tliat is do- ing soune of i' his ' 'cdîueatiiîg. ' You xviii fil tue teaicher a good sort of' uersonl, probabiy a college grauluaite aîudl cap- a i)lc and wiiing ; but she nieeds a bit of enteoutrageri)ient, ani possibly a xvord oxf exI)lanation of your boy' peiteciliarities. Ask lier advice, rcmeîiibcring that pjcople, slionld ask it because tbey xvant iaiud iiot l)ecauise tlîcy xvish to lie bieked i up in the tlî îng t liey ulesire I n (Io. Forget tiat lflrs word of criticisiît ofee y your boy against lhis teier iîitiil voit bave seni te scbooi. f bave i)ften t bouîglt t liere shotl l)C a sebool starteil for parents, for thoni ve woiil all lcarn a bit of wbat ibe sclîools ire tryig to îo-trying xviil ahl their iîîigi t aliîî ina in ili I lie face of social auJd iiîduisirial conditionis xviihca e liv leuîps auî\u003ci bouinds. Volit' hoy is to go tf o ollege. rîlîi\u003c si'lIiool lias prepared ii for the eii- t rance cxaniiiiiat ion. It ilnay niot have îîrepared hila for th(e college. The, transition fronx th blle and flic seolo",
         ".1APANIESE HOIDAVS Io thle (lortiito\u003c)îy aîd the collI ge is co- il iident withi thie Ira lisi Iioni froiîî MoIithl Io mlinlood. Yolt have Sliot lii iii i îîto new and eýxeitinig surroilidungs, onit of al dlisciplinie of a publie sehîool tb aI may haive 'dri yen with Ilble -wilip anîd bel d w'îtl flic reini iîito a discipdiîie thiat trusts lîjul to sec the roald -wi1liont lilii(lCi$ and( to travel iiï il wvtlioiit a lThe Lest ediuatiori is Iiat wliiehluibs 1)051 prcpaced 1dmii foi. tiiis stiîuîggl e. If lie goes to tfli l)d in six miills, it is iectnse ]lis )revioils traininig of cîglit- ('cii years5 ias 1ircliamcd lii iii foi il. Do4 tiot regard (1)1 cge as far' less Seriolîs ili its demiaiiis I liai t ie p)ublie seblool or businiess. I t is flot a p)lace in wlu celi lIo s0w wilId m)ils, or Io tlisî)oit O1(4' S self before being, as soîuce youtlîs thilik, eéolidlnineil for life o ]larid laoai. If :oIu have a tbrc-p (Ilili b4oy, (Io) iiot s1iend a $3,000 editeation on liiiii. rr yon have to skinap and save and prae- tic, sel i denia for four year in l orde r tha t .Joliiiy iiay go 10 eofllege, sec Io it thai lie delivers the goods. Ili a sîteak if lie would spend yonr biard- ea mced iîaoney for nonsense. Mlere ali- tendlanice a t thle t'ollege wi Il ilot iii a b on edieated. I1jearnilîg dloes tiot pene- t tate like a col (t storage eliiil. 'Vie t une bias corne for graduation. '10111 -on 1s 110w ' dîatd' Ii lthe la rger lIfet of the wîîî'kiffay worl d lie is IoI ta lic olie long conlipetil ive exa iii- iiia t 011. Hec will stand at the head ofr Ilie class if Ilie is maister of binmsclf a 114 of lus jobh. .1 AI\u003eANESE 1[OLu1)AYS 'l'lie .Jalaîîsc ive îîanly lîolnlays, ai tliey sîu'ii a great deail of iîîoiîcy Io4 iliake: b-lieildr'i hiippy. Tlhîe fi-i festival tluai appears :Is Illie *JîaecNcW Yea vs aL'Y, wlîiels i, Ilie ilii 0 f Fbîai TIlie sticeets aie 111 perfectlv cleaitiel licfore Ib is hioliday, anid I le toesare ili'ioi'ated\u003c wjtli m'cgicl id baîniboo lita n eues. '[lie wea ItIi v a iid wi'll-to dIO fa î11iiîs preinare al feasi . a11(i also pro- vidle food foi thicir poor iieiglil)ors. Otieî goo\u003cI eniitOni prevails i) Japail. flia I iiingt -%vell Le introduccd iiito Cm 'aiadi a. A Il db imîst lie paîtl at t lic begilmi iiig of' tue ycar. I'iltil this is dlon' no\u003e onte enjoys the lholidaiy.« The second is the \"'Festival of the )oIlIs, ' ' nd the specitil holidayý of littie gil.Just before Ibils holiday the shop- wîi\u003clows aire gily ii doîls of ah1 kInds. f~iy fuiily lis a n iil\u003ecer of lolIs of ail] sizes. Wlien a littie girl is born, ai pairi of doîls is purchased wvithi whioli shi' up'a's tli 511e is aï grown w0ni1. W Ilieu su .1e marrie's ait 11as litle girls oif lier o)vi., slîe giveýs lier dolîs o bier tlaughers. liiis '\"Festival. of 1)oll\u003c s elraiclby iituukurig offerings of sa ki (a kiutd of1 beer iad(e of niec) fi bile efYigies, of the Emipress anti Enipe'u- or, aîîld file wvbole day is spent in actinig Iii wltole or lpaiiese hife. 'Flic dolîs are', il) t'ltitl .1ildreui, yoling ladies, iii\u003e- t lis, andi glalltiniolhlics. TFhis festival la ies place oin thte thirti of May. The boys' festival coeoi\u003cs on lthe fiffit o~f July, a îd is t'allc(l ILe ' 'Feast of' Ba~ ~~h util.' lgs, îa ni lors, loy sol diers, ete., are plireliiist'4 for evei'y meiîcibor of' i be faaîily. Thei boys mardi ihtroiigl the streets gaily tlresscd, wvearing loy swortls and wvaving flags. Thfle fou ith. fesitival1, \"''flc h 'ast Of' i anI cr1ls, is bel d on thie levett of Septemnber. TJ1lîis is ol)seivetl by 'a solcinl procession to lthe lonibs at îaid- niight. The itext festival is the ''Feast of Hiei Crvaitleîuuiui, 'Lield on the niiitli ol' Noveunhber. On Ibis Occasion HloNei's are giveli b everyouic, as uvc givi' gilîs on C'hrîistmas 111y. TIie fapa nese are a very po01ite pe'ople. Tlîey aw vi oted for t beir chtarînu n g, ltOspitality,, and tlteir good nature. Pet' Imps 1 0 lit) lle t'uijoy lite more thiî the' Ja paitese.",
         "THIE WVESTERN SOHOOL JOURNAL Begin the New Year Rîght Now is the time to caret ully examine your supply of' MAPS and GLOBES So that your Board will be able to order your requirements ini ample time for school opening in January. We carry a complete stock of the f ollowing ''Excelsior'' Maps and new School Globes; MAPS Canada (Nc c Eitioli) Large size OntRrio (1915 MElîtion) Large suz ,Xsia Africa Australia, T1he British y1~ \u003c~I jectioni) lirîtîsh Isles D)ominioini \u003cl Europc Eiiglandi awi Watle'. Treland North Ajneriîca Palestinme and(inm 8ruth Amre ,s4ft oia d( ( ' niteil SItates ani Mc WVor]1 (iii 1leinms1mcu'm\"l., ~tLcrcatn *s I 'i~o Size Price ,S4 x 58 iII']ch,...... $5.00 84 x 58\" ... $50 48 x61 .50 x63 50 X6t 48 x 61 50 x 65 48 x 62 48 x 61 50 x 64 49 x 64 45 x 60 38 x 56 50 x 65 50 x 65 48 x 61. 48 x 62 If wanted with spring rollers add $1.40 Net for large map Ontario, and 40c. for each of the other maps. Ail Ou1f, Priee $3.00 each of Cianida and GLOBES No. 904- 9-inch No. 906- 9 No. 908- 9 No. 1204-12 No. 1206-12 No. 1208-12 No. 1808-18 ýeries, Plain, Bronze Stand .......... .. $3.00 Full Meridian, Bronze Stand ..............3.90 Full Mounted, Movable Meridian, Bronze Stand ....... ..................... -6.00 Plain, Bronze Stand ................... 5175 Full Meridian, Bronze Stand .............6.75 Full Mounted, Movable Meridi an, Bronze Stand........................ ..... 9.25 Full Mounted, Movable Meridian, Bronze Stand \u003cspecial to order only) ...... -... 26.00 Write for discounts and special terms to W. J. GAGE \u0026 CO. LIMUTED 82-94 Spadina Ave.,oronto Kelly Dldg., 181 Bannatyne Ave. E., Winnipeg . ... ... ..n. . ..n .................... -a................l..S.... - ......... Klndly mention the Western Schoot Journal when writing to Advertiters. ............ 1 i 'i i i I I i i I g g g i i I I g j' 'I i Il 'I \u003ci i i 'i j' i i",
         "-mes J jrX vm VM ON Wcý \"eý M 5 mon S.S. M lé s ,el.,Ii i. j IF- l\".- V. l R , 1 , m o .1 su\u003e 3 Zk, ee IF W un goum îe iý eL WC U-1 4U Y wk NA pou a -;ei- ià. le àk V ýi, Fn !$Ney VC are k?1711 vp; lut M et pp 7-0, Wl tete Lyot",
         "Vi se . u-I 'Iý ý sý bi el 1 Z lue, â.e. Lý. . 4eý. 254 'f. MUy 2"
      ],
      "lang" : [
         "eng"
      ],
      "published" : [
         "Winnipeg : [Western School Journal Co., 1916]"
      ],
      "note" : [
         "1 electronic text.",
         "Monthly (except July and Aug.)"
      ],
      "title" : [
         "The Western school journal [Vol. 11, no. 1 (Jan. 1916)]"
      ],
      "type" : "document"
   },
   "request" : "http://eco.canadiana.ca/view/oocihm.8_06770_101/1?r=0\u0026s=1\u0026fmt=json\u0026api_text=1"
}
{
   "version" : "0.4",
   "doc" : {
      "type" : "document",
      "title" : [
         "The Western school journal [Vol. 10, no. 5 (May 1915)]"
      ],
